datetime,headline,summary,related,lang,source
2020-12-09 08:27:14-05:00,Rising appetite for risk-as-a-service,"Rising appetite for risk-as-a-service Submitted 09/12/2020 - 1:27pm FIS FIS: Best Risk Management Technology Provider – The essence of the FIS Front Arena solution centres on providing portfolio managers with dashboards that deliver a real time view of positions, risk and performance. Adrian Holt, Director at FIS, identifies that the strength of the solution is the broad range of investment strategies the platform can support: “This coverage is enabled by the vast range of asset classes and associated valuation models which are natively built into the application. Through these models, users have access to a very broad range of analytics and metrics. These are augmented through the integration of other FIS modules such as Monis and APT.” The platform is more than a risk solution and provides full front-to-back office capabilities, including OMS and post-trade operational workflows. Holt comments “The deep integration of risk analytics and metrics into the solution come into their own when we consider the order generation workflow.",FIS,en,Hedgeweek
2020-12-09 07:00:00-05:00,DIGITAL WEALTH MANAGEMENT: Leading robo-advisors have held onto consumer appetite amid the pandemic — here's what incumbents can learn from them to maintain their grasp on a $43 trillion market,"Summary List Placement Insider Intelligence publishes thousands of research reports, charts, and forecasts on the Fintech industry. You can learn more about becoming a client here. The following is a preview of one Fintech report, Digital Wealth Management. You can purchase this report here. Although they only hold a fraction of the more than $43 trillion in investable assets under management (AUM) in North America, digital wealth management adoption is set to grow in the future — presenting an opportunity for fintechs and incumbents alike. Digital wealth managers, also called robo-advisors, came into existence after the financial crisis in 2008, when fintechs aimed to simplify and democratize wealth management services. They use technology such as AI algorithms and machine learning to manage users' assets, while often relying on a hybrid model including human advice to enhance the customer relationship. Insider Intelligence estimates that just around $330 billion was invested in robo-advisors in North America in 2019.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-12-09 05:03:00-05:00,TRANSFORMING USER EXPERIENCE IN BANKING: Here are the strategies winning financial institutions are using to deliver a superior user experience,"Summary List Placement This is a preview of the Business Insider Intelligence Transforming User Experience In Banking research report. Purchase this report here. Business Insider Intelligence offers even more banking coverage with our Banking Briefing. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing banking news and analysis to your inbox. As digital channels become a more critical part of the overall banking journey, banks' design teams need to strategize on how best to create user experiences (UX) that resonate with their customers. A strong UX enables banks to deliver a simple, intuitive, and frictionless digital banking experience. A superior UX can also help banks improve customer satisfaction and bring in new customers. Offering a wide range of in-demand mobile banking features, for example, can satisfy existing customers and drive bank selection among new ones — but only if these features are designed and implemented well: JD Power found that customer satisfaction was negatively impacted across both online and mobile channels by the flood of complex and hard to understand features that are common in banking apps today, per an analysis from its 2019 customer satisfaction ratings.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-12-08 10:36:01-05:00,Three of the most in-demand features banks can offer to give users control over their information,"Summary List Placement As consumers digitize their lives, it's more important than ever for banks to offer robust mobile tools that keep customers in control of their money and financial information. Insider Intelligence's US Mobile Banking Competitive Edge Report 2020 found that Security and Control is the most-valued category of features, with 36% of US respondents who are mobile banking users on average rating each feature ""extremely valuable,"" versus a 32% average for the second-place Account Management and Alerts categories. Here are the three most in-demand security and card control features among US respondents that banks can offer to empower their growing mobile user bases against threats . Insider Intelligence also evaluated the availability of each feature at the top 25 US financial institutions (FIs) by assets, to gauge how well banks are currently meeting these needs. Ordering a replacement credit or debit card through a bank's mobile app preempts a detour to an automated phone system—and it's the most highly demanded Security and Control feature.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-12-08 08:00:45-05:00,FIs Turn To FinTechs To Elevate Trade Finance,"While the bank-FinTech collaborative paradigm can enhance a wide array of solutions for corporate and small business end users, this week's look at the latest tie-ups shows a rising interest in strengthening trade finance. Financial institutions (FIs) like Barclays and Danske Bank are turning to third-party partners to mitigate risk and connect more businesses with […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-12-07 15:30:43-05:00,JPMorgan Chase Adds Voice To Stimulus Debate,"One of the nation’s largest financial institutions (FIs) is quietly pushing for another round of stimulus funding, with the focus on helping jobless workers and low-income families. J.P. Morgan Chase has sent over to President-Elect Joe Biden a series of recommendations on what the banking giant thinks should be in the next stimulus package, as […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-12-07 12:16:39-05:00,Bank of America – International Playing cards Market 2020 | Know the Firms Checklist Might Doubtlessly Profit or Free out,"Bank of America - International Playing cards Market 2020 | Know the Firms Checklist Might Doubtlessly Profit or Free out From the Influence of COVID-19 | Prime Firms: American Express, Visa, MasterCard, FIS, Bank of America, and so forth. -",FIS,en,Fintech Zoom
2020-12-07 07:02:00-05:00,"THE DIGITAL BANKING ECOSYSTEM: These are the key players, biggest shifts, and trends driving short- and long-term growth in one of the world's largest industries","Summary List Placement This is a preview of Digital Banking Ecosystem research report from Business Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. Business Insider Intelligence offers even more fintech coverage with Banking Pro. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing finance news and analysis to your inbox. The banking industry is in the grips of an identity crisis. Leaders of the world's largest banks — such as Citi, BBVA, and Goldman Sachs — have begun describing themselves as technology companies with banking licenses. However, this description is still aspirational. Executing the vision will require billions of dollars in investments, the restructuring of teams, a reimagining of the entire banking technology stack, and the adoption of a far more customer-centric business view. The stakes of failing to transform are high: Accenture projects that 35% of all bank revenues could be at risk from more tech-savvy competitors like fintechs as soon as 2020 for incumbents that fail to up their game.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-12-06 20:01:20-05:00,How the cloud is the path to open banking - FinTech Futures,"Andrew Beatty, head of global next generation banking at FIS, writes about how cloud and open banking are changing the financial services landscape.",FIS,en,FinTech Futures
2020-12-06 06:26:15-05:00,"Covid-19 Influence on International Actual Time Funds Market (2020-2026) | Potential progress, enticing valuation make it’","Covid-19 Influence on International Actual Time Funds Market (2020-2026) | Potential progress, enticing valuation make it's a long-term funding | Prime Gamers: FIS, Fiserv, PayPal, Wirecard, Mastercard, and many others. -",FIS,en,Fintech Zoom
2020-12-02 09:06:44-05:00,"Cashless payments on the rise but security concerns remain, according to new Worldpay from FIS survey - Fintech Finance","The decline in the use of cash has led to a rise in security concerns over cashless payments, according to […]",FIS,en,Fintech Finance
2020-11-26 04:00:08-05:00,Danish digital bank Lunar picks FIS for treasury and risk - FinTech Futures,Denmark-based digital bank Lunar has selected a cloud-based treasury and risk management solution from FIS to boost its operations.,FIS,en,FinTech Futures
2020-11-20 09:30:15-05:00,Mobile Banking App Users Pull Ahead Of FIs On Expectations,"It’s been a long slog since April 2020 when a harmonic convergence of bad financial news and a worsening global health crisis formed the “crater” of the pandemic. April was also the month that financial institutions (FIs) and Big Tech firms alike learned that mobile banking had become a much bigger, more important channel, virtually […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-11-19 08:00:00-05:00,FIS Tops Chartis RiskTech100® Rankings for Sixth Straight Year,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--For the sixth year in a row, financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) has placed first in the Chartis RiskTech100®. Compiled by leading research and analysis firm Chartis Research, the RiskTech100® is an annual ranking of the world’s top 100 providers of risk and compliance technology. In addition to being ranked as the top provider in 2020, FIS also won in the categories of Functionality, Market Presence, Insurance, Trading & Capital Markets, Actuar",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-11-17 09:20:16-05:00,Dow Jones strikes deal for news content on FIS terminals - Talking Biz News,"Dow Jones & Co. has struck a deal to make its news content available through FIS’s MarketMap terminal. Users will have access to daily content from Dow Jones Newswires, The Wall Street Journal, Barron’s,…",FIS,en,Talking Biz News
2020-11-17 04:01:35-05:00,Authentication Creates Opportunity To Solve FIs' $1 Trillion Fraud Problem,"The great digital shift has created a host of problems for banks — 1 trillion problems to be exact. As reported by PYMNTS, more than half of all bank customers in the U.S. — representing 118 million individuals — use mobile banking apps. And 51 percent of mobile banking app users log in and use […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-11-16 22:20:00-05:00,This Is What Hedge Funds Bought And Sold In Q3: Complete 13F Summary,"This Is What Hedge Funds Bought And Sold In Q3: Complete 13F Summary Tyler Durden Mon, 11/16/2020 - 22:20 While we live in a time when the holdings of the top 20 Robinhood ""investors"" have far more information value for markets and other traders than a glimpse into what hedge funds are doing, not in the least because retail investors are outperforming both the S&P500 and hedge funds 10-to-1… ... unfortunately there is still no regulatory requirement for even superstar retail investors to disclose their holdings, which is why we have to be satisfied with the quarterly 13-F publication spectacle, which just concluded today, and which revealed that even as tech stocks suffered two correction shakeouts since early September, hedge funds mostly stuck with the ""safety"" of tech stocks during the third quarter heading into the election, even as some hedge funds trimmed Amazon.com as the dominant e-commerce platform thrived amid a pandemic-fueled surge in online shopping, while others sold Netflix Courtesy of Bloomberg, below is a snapshot of what some of the most prominent tech stock additions as disclosed by today's barrage of 13F filings: Coatue Management doubled its holdings of Tesla in the three months ended Sept. 30, making the electric-vehicle maker its second-biggest publicly disclosed holding.","FIS,FISV",en,Zero Hedge
2020-11-13 04:30:49-05:00,World Playing cards Market 2020 | Know the Firms Listing Might Doubtlessly Profit or Unfastened out From the Influence of COVID-,"World Playing cards Market 2020 | Know the Firms Listing Might Doubtlessly Profit or Unfastened out From the Influence of COVID-19 | Prime Firms: American Specific, Visa, MasterCard, FIS, Bank of America, and so forth. -",FIS,en,Fintech Zoom
2020-11-13 04:00:32-05:00,FIs and FinTechs Ally To Drive Urgency Around AP Automation,"Accounts payable (AP) and accounts receivable (AR) are two sides of the cash flow management coin, you might say. In striving to marry workflows across the two and in driving to bring the respective strengths of financial institutions (FIs) and FinTechs together, sometimes one plus one equals three. And in an interview with Karen Webster, […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-11-12 09:18:00-05:00,Avaloq's partnership with Google Cloud will supercharge its digital banking services,"Summary List Placement Clients of the Swiss-based fintech software provider will be able to use its digital banking suite and other platforms on Google Cloud, per Finextra. Avaloq offers its wealth management and banking clients an array of end-to-end solutions through its platforms, which automate manual back-office processes and enhance data analytics capabilities, among other areas. The strategic partnership supports Avaloq's mission to become a leading provider of cloud platform solutions by expediting the time-to-market and scalability of its solutions. Clients will be able to run Avaloq's cloud-native solutions immediately through Google Cloud, rather than having to integrate the applications onto Google Cloud's or another provider's platform themselves. This will save clients time and effort, making Avaloq's solutions more attractive to financial institutions (FIs). Simultaneously, FIs will be able to access Google infrastructure to rapidly scale the use of Avaloq's cloud-based applications and their associated benefits, such as the automation of manual back-office processes.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-11-12 08:55:00-05:00,Republican lawmakers are requesting lenience for PPP lenders,"Summary List Placement Republican senators have asked regulators to excuse banks that participate in federal coronavirus relief programs from additional regulatory scrutiny, American Banker reports . Specifically, lawmakers want to ensure that smaller banks and credit unions whose asset totals may have swollen as a result of making Paycheck Protection Program (PPP) loans don't face heavier regulatory burdens like those that apply to financial institutions (FIs) with over $10 billion in assets under the Dodd-Frank Act. The concerns have been received sympathetically by vice chairman of the Federal Reserve Randal Quarles and acting comptroller of the currency Brian Brooks. Financial regulators' receptiveness to the proposals reflect their inclination to reduce red tape for banks and businesses grappling with the coronavirus pandemic. Last week, the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB) issued a no-action letter to Bank of America for its new small-dollar loan offering, meaning that the bank is unlikely to see supervisory or enforcement action from the bureau for the offering.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-11-12 04:03:18-05:00,"Report: Strategic Payment Investments Give FIs, FinTechs Innovative Payment Options","There is no denying that the COVID-19 pandemic has rapidly accelerated the global shift toward digital commerce. Safety-minded consumers the world over can now be seen tapping contactless cards, scanning QR codes or utilizing voice ordering technologies to make purchases without potentially putting themselves or others at risk of contracting the virus. The technological seeds […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-11-10 10:40:55-05:00,Growing retail demand for PE,"Growing retail demand for PE Submitted 10/11/2020 - 3:40pm FIS FIS: Best Accounting & Reporting Software – Private equity firms look likely to continue operating remotely and engaging virtually with investors. And as more retail investing strategies and 401k plans in the US embrace private equity, the industry is also seeing greater demands for access to information and higher standards of reporting. Dan Kaytes (pictured), Head of Product and Delivery for Private Markets at FIS, says technology is playing a critical role: “Technology solutions are helping to service the demands of the private equity investor. Technology is also providing organisations with scale, while process automation enables team members to focus on higher value tasks and activities.” Technology solutions have also been thrown into further focus as a result of the Covid-19 pandemic. Kaytes notes: “Covid-19 is driving digital transformation across all industries. It has emphasised the need to ensure everyone can continue to deliver for the firm regardless of their work location. “Technology is key to enabling collaboration among team members and portfolio companies.",FIS,en,PrivateEquityWire
2020-11-05 18:13:52-05:00,Bank Innovation-affiliated marketing accelerator accepting applications,"INV Fintech, Bank Innovation’s affiliate accelerator, has started accepting applications for its January 2021 cohort. INV is a marketing accelerator designed to advanced fintech startups’ brands and sales through the innovation-oriented financial institutions in its membership, as well as the Bank Innovation media venture. The FIs count on INV for their innovation discovery to uncover […]",FIS,en,Bank Innovation
2020-11-05 14:00:00-05:00,Reynolds and Reynolds Selects FIS as its Exclusive Integrated Payment Processing Provider,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) has been selected as the exclusive payments provider to The Reynolds and Reynolds Company, a leading provider of automotive dealership software, documents, and professional services. Under the multi-year agreement, Worldpay from FIS has assumed all payment processing activities for Reynolds and Reynolds’ integrated payment solution, ReyPAY®, which provides fast, convenient, and contactless payment options for auto",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-11-05 11:08:17-05:00,Provision of SARFAESI Act empowering DMs to attach secured assets of borrowers directory: SC,"New Delhi: In a relief to banks and financial institutions (FIs), the Supreme Court Thursday held that a provision of the SARFAESI Act empowering District Magistrates to take possession of secured assets of defaulting borrowers within 60 days period for handing them over to the lending FIs was “directory” and not “mandatory” in nature as banks cannot be made to suffer for the delay on the part of the government officers.Section 14 of the Securitisation and Reconstruction of Financial Assets and Enforcement of Security Interest (SARFAESI) Act mandates District Magistrate to deliver possession of a secured asset within 30 days, extendable to an aggregate of 60 days upon reasons recorded in writing, to banks.The top court was faced with the question whether the provision was directory or mandatory in nature and if the banks or FIs can be made to suffer if DMs fail to act within 60 days in taking over the secured assets of defaulting borrowers and handing them back to the banks or FIs.A bench of Justices L Nageswara Rao, Hemant Gupta and Ajay Rastogi upheld the Kerala High Court verdict which had said that the secured creditor would be “adversely affected if the provision is construed as mandatory and not directory” as it would also delay the process of taking physical possession of assets.Justice Gupta, writing the judgement, said the SARFAESI Act was enacted to provide a machinery for empowering banks and financial institutions, so that they may have the power to take possession of secured assets and to sell them.The Debt Recovery Tribunals Act was first enacted to streamline the recovery of public dues but the proceedings under that law have not given desirous results and hence the SARFAESI Act was enacted, it said.Referring to judgements, the top court said, “The purpose of the Act pertains to the speedy recovery of dues, by banks and financial institutions.",FIS,en,Economic Times India
2020-11-05 04:01:49-05:00,"FIS: Contactless Payments, Curbside Pickup Will Become Digital-First Necessities","The COVID-era embrace of curbside pickup will not only be around long after the pandemic, but could be just the thing that convinces more and more consumers to make the digital leap. After all, Norm Marraccini, senior vice president of digital payments, ACH and RTP at FIS, told Karen Webster in a recent Masterclass interview […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-11-02 10:30:11-05:00,FIs Need To Think Like Tech Firms With Banking Licenses,"Digital payments are, in a way, overwriting legacy systems with new “code” for these connected, touchless times. It’s what the people want, but transformation introduces complexity that must be well-managed. Systems choices and related variables help determine that success. “The ongoing COVID-19 pandemic is dramatically affecting the digital payments industry,” according to PYMNTS latest FI’s […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-11-01 08:20:53-05:00,Banks told to credit 'interest on interest',"Banks, financial and non-banking financial institutions have been asked to take ""necessary actions"" to credit into the accounts of eligible borrowers by November 5 the difference between compound and simple interest collected on loans of up to Rs 2 crore during the moratorium scheme, RBI has told the Supreme Court. The Reserve Bank of India (RBI), in an affidavit filed through Assistant General Manager Prasanta Kumar Das, referred to the October 23 additional response of the Ministry of Finance and said the federal bank has also acted in pursuance of that by issuing a notification to banks and FIs recently on refund of extra money to the borrowers. The central government had earlier told the apex court that the lenders have been asked to credit into the accounts of eligible borrowers the difference between compound and simple interest collected on loans of up to Rs 2 crore during the RBI's loan moratorium scheme by November 5. ""All Primary (Urban) Cooperative Banks/State Cooperative Banks/District Central Cooperative Banks, All All India Financial Institutions and All Non-Banking Financial Companies (including Housing Finance Companies) to be guided by the provisions of the scheme and take necessary actions within the stipulated timeline therein,"" the RBI said in its recent affidavit.",FIS,en,Economic Times India
2020-10-30 08:30:42-05:00,How FIs Counter Online Debit And Credit Card Skimming,"Debit-card skimming schemes have moved online. Lindsay Land, Consumers Credit Union’s vice president of operations, explains how tokenizing debit payments can help eTailers foil fraudsters’ plans for an easy, undetected payday.",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-10-30 03:03:48-05:00,FIS President: B2B Payments Transformation Needs Strong Value Proposition,"With the worst of the COVID crisis hopefully behind it, financial services giant FIS is now on the lookout for something that will utilize its now fire-tested ability to respond quickly to customers’ changing needs. According to Bruce Lowthers, president of banking and merchant solutions at FIS, the key challenge the industry currently faces has […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-10-29 03:08:21-05:00,"Earnings Scheduled For October 29, 2020",Companies Reporting Before The Bell • PG&E (NYSE: PCG ) is likely to report quarterly earnings at $0.27 per share on revenue of $4.72 billion. • Silicom (NASDAQ: SILC ) is estimated to report quarterly earnings at $0.35 per share on revenue of $26.68 million. • Ambev (NYSE: ABEV ) is expected to report quarterly earnings at $0.02 per share on revenue of $2.28 billion. • Ares Commercial Real (NYSE: ACRE ) is estimated to report quarterly earnings at $0.24 per share on revenue of $17.15 million. • Alliance Data Systems (NYSE: ADS ) is expected to report quarterly earnings at $2.20 per share on revenue of $1.01 billion. • Agenus (NASDAQ: AGEN ) is expected to report quarterly loss at $0.26 per share on revenue of $14.00 million. • Alexion Pharmaceuticals (NASDAQ: ALXN ) is projected to report quarterly earnings at $2.58 per share on revenue of $1.42 billion. • AMETEK (NYSE: AME ) is estimated to report quarterly earnings at $0.93 per share on revenue of $1.11 billion. • Amerant Bancorp (NASDAQ: AMTB ) is projected to report quarterly earnings at $0.,FIS,en,Benzinga
2020-10-28 07:00:00-05:00,National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation Selects FIS for Commercial Loan Enhancement,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE:FIS) today announced that it has been selected by the National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation (CFC) to help the organization consolidate its loan origination and management platform to better serve its members in the utilities industry. CFC is a nonprofit, member-owned organization that provides financing to electric cooperatives that serve more than half of the land mass of the United States. CFC was l",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-10-27 09:39:00-05:00,A new US House of Representatives bill would exempt PPP loans from small banks' asset totals,"Summary List Placement Under the legislation, when regulators calculate the asset totals of banks and credit unions with less than $15 billion in assets, Paycheck Protection Programs (PPP) loans would not be counted, American Banker reports . This would shield small financial institutions (FIs) from additional regulatory requirements that banks with more than $10 billion have to deal with under the Dodd-Frank Act. If the bill becomes law, it could free up smaller FIs to continue participating in future government stimulus measures as the coronavirus pandemic drags on. If banks are concerned that relief lending would result in onerous, unmanageable regulatory obligations, they may not be willing to continue lending in the future. That would significantly dent the government's effectiveness in distributing relief funds: 5,338 lenders with less than $10 billion in assets were responsible for a total of $233.78 billion in PPP loans, or 45% of the program's total, per Small Business Administration data from the program's close in early August.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-10-27 09:00:00-05:00,"FIS Chairman, President and CEO Gary Norcross Receives Corporate Citizenship Award from The Conference Board Committee for Economic Development","JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) announced today that Chairman, President and CEO Gary Norcross is receiving the 2020 Corporate Citizenship Award from the Committee for Economic Development (CED), the U.S. public policy center of The Conference Board. The award recognizes Norcross’ and the company’s commitment to corporate responsibility practices. Norcross is one of six corporate leaders being recognized for 2020 Corporate Citizenship Awards at",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-10-27 07:00:00-05:00,Brazilian Credit Card Issuer Afinz Moves to FIS for Processing Services to Support Growth Strategy,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) announced that it has been selected by Brazilian financial services provider Afinz to provide processing services across the company’s full portfolio of private-label credit cards. Afinz is a new FIS client in Brazil. Formerly Sorocred, Afinz recently rebranded as part of a strategic business expansion into a fintech company offering a wide range of credit products and other financial services for consumers and re",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-10-26 08:43:00-05:00,The Consumer Financial Protection Bureau is moving toward open banking regulation,"Summary List Placement The Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB) has issued an advanced notice of proposed rulemaking that seeks comments and information to assist the bureau in implementing section 1033 of the Dodd-Frank Act, which will determine how consumers' access to their financial information is regulated. A future decision by the CFPB could put the US on a path to a more standardized open banking system, similar to that of the UK . To this point, consumers' access to financial data sharing in the US has been largely dependent on private-sector efforts. Plaid , for example, already offers consumers who have data at financial institutions (FIs) that cooperate with it the ability to share their data with Plaid's network of fintechs. And Plaid is a member of the Financial Data Exchange (FDX), a financial industry consortium with over 100 members, that has espoused its own data-sharing principles. But this is distinctly different from a governmental body issuing guidance on how FIs—particularly major banks—need to handle financial data sharing, which would carry the weight of a regulatory obligation to comply.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-10-26 06:01:00-05:00,"THE DIGITAL BANKING ECOSYSTEM: These are the key players, biggest shifts, and trends driving short- and long-term growth in one of the world's largest industries","Summary List Placement This is a preview of Digital Banking Ecosystem research report from Business Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. Business Insider Intelligence offers even more fintech coverage with Banking Pro. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing finance news and analysis to your inbox. The banking industry is in the grips of an identity crisis. Leaders of the world's largest banks — such as Citi, BBVA, and Goldman Sachs — have begun describing themselves as technology companies with banking licenses. However, this description is still aspirational. Executing the vision will require billions of dollars in investments, the restructuring of teams, a reimagining of the entire banking technology stack, and the adoption of a far more customer-centric business view. The stakes of failing to transform are high: Accenture projects that 35% of all bank revenues could be at risk from more tech-savvy competitors like fintechs as soon as 2020 for incumbents that fail to up their game.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2020-10-25 01:38:42-05:00,"Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE:FIS) Forecasted to Post Q2 2021 Earnings of $1.53 Per Share","Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE:FIS) – Equities researchers at Oppenheimer decreased their Q2 2021 earnings estimates for Fidelity National Information Services in a report released on Wednesday, October 21st. Oppenheimer analyst D. Gabriele now expects that the information technology services provider will post earnings per share of $1.53 for the quarter, down from their […]",FIS,en, Dakota Financial News
2020-10-24 20:14:41-05:00,"$1.41 EPS Expected for Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE:FIS) This Quarter","Equities research analysts forecast that Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE:FIS) will post earnings of $1.41 per share for the current fiscal quarter, according to Zacks. Ten analysts have provided estimates for Fidelity National Information Services’ earnings, with estimates ranging from $1.33 to $1.56. Fidelity National Information Services reported earnings per share of $1.43 in […]",FIS,en,The Lincolnian
2020-10-24 10:00:57-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services (NYSE:FIS) Price Target Raised to $178.00 at Raymond James,"Fidelity National Information Services (NYSE:FIS) had its price target hoisted by Raymond James from $172.00 to $178.00 in a research note issued on Friday, Analyst Ratings Network reports. The firm currently has a “strong-buy” rating on the information technology services provider’s stock. Raymond James’ price objective would indicate a potential upside of 23.27% from the […]",FIS,en,Transcript Daily
2020-10-24 09:18:45-05:00,Raymond James Increases Fidelity National Information Services (NYSE:FIS) Price Target to $178.00,"Fidelity National Information Services (NYSE:FIS) had its target price increased by Raymond James from $172.00 to $178.00 in a report published on Friday morning, Analyst Ratings Network reports. Raymond James currently has a strong-buy rating on the information technology services provider’s stock. A number of other analysts have also commented on the company. Mizuho began […]",FIS,en,Transcript Daily
2020-10-23 20:22:41-05:00,"Q2 2021 Earnings Estimate for Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. Issued By Oppenheimer (NYSE:FIS)","Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE:FIS) – Equities research analysts at Oppenheimer lowered their Q2 2021 earnings estimates for shares of Fidelity National Information Services in a report issued on Wednesday, October 21st. Oppenheimer analyst D. Gabriele now anticipates that the information technology services provider will post earnings per share of $1.53 for the quarter, […]",FIS,en,Daily Political
2020-10-23 10:48:53-05:00,"Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE:FIS) to Issue Quarterly Dividend of $0.35","Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE:FIS) declared a quarterly dividend on Thursday, October 22nd, RTT News reports. Shareholders of record on Monday, December 14th will be paid a dividend of 0.35 per share by the information technology services provider on Monday, December 28th. This represents a $1.40 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend […]",FIS,en,Zolmax News
2020-10-23 09:00:16-05:00,"Q2 2021 Earnings Forecast for Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE:FIS) Issued By Oppenheimer","Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE:FIS) – Stock analysts at Oppenheimer cut their Q2 2021 earnings per share estimates for Fidelity National Information Services in a research report issued to clients and investors on Wednesday, October 21st. Oppenheimer analyst D. Gabriele now anticipates that the information technology services provider will earn $1.53 per share for […]",FIS,en,Transcript Daily
2020-10-22 17:00:00-05:00,THE PAYMENTS ECOSYSTEM: The biggest shifts and trends driving short- and long-term growth and shaping the future of the industry,"Summary List Placement This is a preview of The Payments Ecosystem research report from Business Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. Business Insider Intelligence offers even more consumer coverage with Payments & Commerce Pro. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing payments and commerce news and analysis to your inbox. The power dynamics in the payments industry are changing as businesses and consumers shift dollars from cash and checks to digital payment methods. Cards dominate the in-store retail channel, but mobile wallets like Apple Pay are seeing a rapid uptick in usage. At the same time, e-commerce will chip away at brick-and-mortar retail as smartphones attract a rising share of digital shopping. Digital peer-to-peer (P2P) apps are supplanting cash in the day-to-day lives of users across generations as they become more appealing and useful than ever. And change is trickling down into bigger industries long-dominated by cash and check, like remittances and business-to-business payments.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2020-10-22 15:30:00-05:00,FIS Announces Quarterly Dividend,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS® (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, announced today a regular quarterly dividend of $0.35 per common share. The dividend is payable on Dec. 28, 2020, to shareholders of record as of close of business on Dec. 14, 2020. About FIS FIS is a leading provider of technology solutions for merchants, banks and capital markets firms globally. Our employees are dedicated to advancing the way the world pays, banks and invests by applying",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-10-21 23:56:43-05:00,JPMorgan Chase & Co. Increases Fidelity National Information Services (NYSE:FIS) Price Target to $170.00,"Fidelity National Information Services (NYSE:FIS) had its price objective hoisted by equities researchers at JPMorgan Chase & Co. from $168.00 to $170.00 in a research report issued to clients and investors on Tuesday, The Fly reports. The firm presently has an “overweight” rating on the information technology services provider’s stock. JPMorgan Chase & Co.‘s price […]",FIS,en,Dispatch Tribunal
2020-10-21 20:04:41-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services (FIS) to Release Quarterly Earnings on Thursday,"Fidelity National Information Services (NYSE:FIS) is scheduled to post its quarterly earnings results before the market opens on Thursday, October 29th. Analysts expect Fidelity National Information Services to post earnings of $1.41 per share for the quarter. Investors interested in participating in the company’s conference call can do so using this link. Fidelity National Information […]",FIS,en,US Banking News
2020-10-21 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Adds Walgreens to Growing Roster of Merchants and Retailers Tapping into the Power of Premium Payback,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS® (NYSE: FIS) has announced the addition of Walgreens to its growing list of merchants and retailers using Premium Payback, the company’s real-time rewards redemption network. Starting this month, Walgreens customers with eligible payment cards will be able to tap into their credit card rewards points in real-time to help pay for in-store purchases. Walgreens is one of a growing number of merchants to offer its customers the opportunity to take advantage",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-10-21 00:00:00-05:00,DIGITAL WEALTH MANAGEMENT: Leading robo-advisors have held onto consumer appetite amid the pandemic — here's what incumbents can learn from them to maintain their grasp on a $43 trillion market,"Summary List Placement Insider Intelligence publishes thousands of research reports, charts, and forecasts on the Fintech industry. You can learn more about becoming a client here. The following is a preview of one Fintech report, Digital Wealth Management. You can purchase this report here. Although they only hold a fraction of the more than $43 trillion in investable assets under management (AUM) in North America, digital wealth management adoption is set to grow in the future — presenting an opportunity for fintechs and incumbents alike. Digital wealth managers, also called robo-advisors, came into existence after the financial crisis in 2008, when fintechs aimed to simplify and democratize wealth management services. They use technology such as AI algorithms and machine learning to manage users' assets, while often relying on a hybrid model including human advice to enhance the customer relationship. Insider Intelligence estimates that just around $330 billion was invested in robo-advisors in North America in 2019.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-10-20 07:00:00-05:00,Worldpay from FIS Expands Operations in Argentina with Domestic Acquiring Capability,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS® (NYSE: FIS) today announced the latest expansion of its global footprint in the Latin American market by securing domestic card scheme acquiring licenses in Argentina. With the ability to offer local merchants in-country payment processing, Argentine sellers will have access to a broader set of Worldpay from FIS merchant solutions products and services for online commerce. Worldpay processes billions of transactions annually across 146 countries and mor",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-10-19 21:01:00-05:00,THE BUY BUTTON REPORT: The introduction of SRC will turn the online retail payments industry on its head — here's how payments players can win in the new checkout landscape,"Summary List Placement This is a preview of The Buy Button research report from Business Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. Business Insider Intelligence offers even more consumer coverage with Payments & Commerce Pro. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing payments and commerce news and analysis to your inbox. Payments firms have introduced buy buttons to streamline the online checkout process, but so many have done so that it can have the opposite effect. This led companies to introduce buy buttons so consumers could skip the cumbersome, labor-intensive steps required to input contact and payment information online, and to allow them to shop online more freely. But the array of options has become overwhelming. Firms such as Mastercard, Visa, Apple, Amazon, Walmart, point-of-sale (POS) financing providers, and many more have developed buy buttons for their payment methods. This glut undercuts the convenience buy buttons are meant to introduce, as consumers don't know which option will be available where, and they must search crowded checkout pages for their desired option.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-10-17 15:00:00-05:00,A fortuitously-timed acquisition moved this Fortune 500 fintech's strategy 'years ahead' during COVID,"The $43 billion acquisition of Worldpay, a payment processing company, positioned Fidelity National Information Services (FIS) to reap the benefits of digital transformations caused by the pandemic.",FIS,en,Fortune
2020-10-14 09:07:00-05:00,UK regulators host first Forum to assess use of AI in financial services,"Summary List Placement The Financial Services AI Public Private Forum brings the UK's Financial Conduct Authority (FCA) and Bank of England (BoE) together with AI experts from financial services, tech, and academia, to assess whether additional guidance or regulation is needed to support the safe adoption of AI in financial services , per the FCA. The Forum will host a series of quarterly meetings and workshops over the next year to discuss AI uses and benefits, constraints to deployment, and potential risks. The FCA and BoE opened the Forum to membership applications in October 2019, following the publication of their report on the application of AI in UK financial services. The Forum aims to tackle AI-related risks amid rising adoption within UK financial services. There are public policy concerns over the perceived risks of AI decision-making. AI algorithms that are trained on incomplete or extraneous data, for example, can yield judgments that are biased , causing a range of issues from inconvenient technical errors to inadvertent discrimination.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-10-13 07:15:00-05:00,FIS Ranks First in IDC FinTech Rankings for Fourth Consecutive Year,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) announced today that it has been ranked first in the 2020 IDC FinTech Rankings for the fourth consecutive year. The ranking highlights the top 100 global providers of financial technology based on prior-year revenue. FIS has been first in the IDC FinTech rankings for eight of the past 10 years. “FIS continues to grow organically while also making large strategic acquisitions and partnerships,” said Marc DeCastro,",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-10-09 15:35:26-05:00,Alpine skiing: Lewis removed as FIS secretary general after confidence vote,https://www.investing.com/news/general/alpine-skiing-lewis-removed-as-fis-secretary-general-after-confidence-vote-2320916,FIS,en,Investing.com
2020-10-09 08:40:51-05:00,Martin Wingate swaps Calypso for FIS,Martin Wingate has resurfaced as a business solutions consultant for FIS after leaving Calypso last month.,FIS,en,SecuritiesLendingTimes
2020-10-07 12:15:00-05:00,"FIS to Report Third Quarter Earnings on October 29, 2020","JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS® (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, will announce third quarter 2020 financial results on Thurs., Oct. 29, 2020, prior to market open. The company will sponsor a live webcast of its earnings conference call with the investment community beginning at 9:00 a.m. (EST) the same day. To access the webcast, go to the Investor Relations section of FIS’ homepage, www.fisglobal.com. A replay will be available after the conclusion of th",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-10-07 06:50:43-05:00,"India Becomes Global Leader in Realtime Transactions, Records 41 Million Daily Payments","According to latest report from FIS, the Covid-19 pandemic has seen India doubling its every day real-time transactions at 41 million.",FIS,en,CNN-News18
2020-10-07 05:48:33-05:00,India becomes the global leader in real-time transactions with 41 million payments per day: Report,"Mumbai: Thanks to the pandemic, the country has become the global leader in real-time financial transactions with 41 million transactions per day, which is more than double that of the last year, says an international report. The COVID-19 pandemic has seen India doubling its every day real-time transactions at 41 million, says the latest report from FIS, which is a leading provider of technology solutions for merchants, banks and capital markets firms globally. According to the report released on Wednesday, six other countries also saw more than doubling of their real-time payment transactions year-over-year, while four saw at least a twofold increase in transaction value. But in terms of the growth rate, the list is topped by Bahrain with 657 per cent growth, followed by Ghana clipping at 488 per cent, the Philippines growing at 309 per cent, Australia at 214 per cent, and Poland at 208 per cent. India's growth was 213 per cent, handling 41 million transactions a day, according to the report. ""India leads global real-time payments, processing 41 million real-time transactions per day, more than any other country in the world,"" says the report, adding the country continues to innovate with the launch of extensive business services on the real-time rails including IPO subscriptions, mandate management and invoice-in-the-box.",FIS,en,Economic Times India
2020-10-06 09:36:00-05:00,NEC Corp will purchase fintech software provider Avaloq for $2.2 billion,"Summary List Placement The Japan-based technology giant stated that it'll acquire Switzerland-based fintech software provider Avaloq from private equity firm Warburg Pincus and other shareholders, per Reuters. NEC offers digital solutions to global clients cross-sector, including aerospace, telecoms, and finance, and plans to acquire 100% of Avaloq's shares by April 2021. Avaloq, which offers core banking and centralized data platform solutions to its 150-plus clients, representing approximately $4.5 trillion in client assets, will continue to operate as a separate entity following the completion of the deal. NEC has been on an acquisition spree as it seeks to maximize profits, and the latest purchase aims to expand its presence in digital finance. NEC has undergone significant restructuring over the last decade, which has involved divesting from less profitable business units, such as its semiconductor and smartphone businesses. Concurrently, NEC has struck takeover deals of innovative technology firms, including Denmark-based IT company KMD for over $1 billion in 2018 and UK-based public-sector software solution provider Northgate Public Services for over $500 million in 2018.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-10-05 07:00:00-05:00,"Volume of Real-time Payments Surges During Pandemic, FIS Reports in New Study","JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--New research released today by FIS® (NYSE: FIS) shows that adoption and usage of real-time payments has accelerated amidst the COVID-19 pandemic and the real-time rails are now offering capabilities that extend beyond instant payments. FIS’ seventh annual Flavors of Fast report highlights key findings about real-time payments networks across the globe: Six countries have seen a twofold or greater increase in number of real-time payments processed over the pa",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-10-01 08:24:00-05:00,Arthur J. Gallagher's ransomware attack highlights the threat financial institutions face amid lockdown restrictions,"Summary List Placement The US-based insurance broker has disclosed that it temporarily shut down global systems following a ransomware attack on Saturday, per Intelligent Insurer. The insurer acted decisively, not only taking its systems offline, but also launching an investigation and employing an external cybersecurity firm to address the issue. Gallagher stated that although the investigation is in its infancy, the attack initially seems to only have impacted a limited part of its operations, and the insurer does not expect that it will lead to a material impact on its operations, nor its finances. Gallagher restarted its global systems on Monday. The ransomware attack is the latest in a long line of cyberattacks against financial institutions (FIs), which highlights the burgeoning threat they face amid lockdown restrictions. Large FIs' sizable total assets and vast amounts of customer data make them attractive targets—and as a result, malware attacks against FIs amounted to 25% of total global incidents in 2019 , a higher proportion than any other industry.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-10-01 07:04:00-05:00,"Sustainable-stock funds are snapping up shares of these 20 companies — and most of them beat the market during September's turmoil, RBC says","Summary List Placement Going green is helping hedge funds make green right now. That's the conclusion of a team lead by RBC Strategist Sara Mahaffy. After poring over the holdings of both traditional and environmental, social, and governance-focused hedge funds, she writes that the stocks ESG funds liked the best in the second quarter are pulling off a difficult trifecta in 2020. They fared very well during the two major sell-offs of the year — they outperformed during the coronavirus crash in February and March, beat the market dramatically during the March-through-September rally, and stayed above water during the slump that overtook the market after its record high on September 2. Since then the S&P 500 has dropped 6.1%, and the tech-heavy Nasdaq endured a 10% correction. The bulk of ESG hedge funds' new picks fared better. Overall, their 2020 relative return compared to the S&P 500 stood at 11.7% on September 25. It's been part of a good run of stock-picking for ESG funds, as Mahaffy also notes that stocks popular with those funds but less-liked by traditional hedge funds are also significant winners. ""Names that are only popular in sustainable funds outperformed,"" Mahaffy wrote, adding that the stocks aren't especially expensive based on longer-term price metrics. ""Names that are only popular in sustainable funds are still trading below their early 2020 highs, though they have been inching up slowly in recent months."" The following stocks were bought by the largest number of actively managed fundamental hedge funds during the second quarter, when the market was on the comeback trail following the February-March drop.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-09-29 07:00:00-05:00,$4.3 billion Marqeta is targeting a wider range of customers for its digital cards with a new 'tokenization-as-a-service' push,"Summary List Placement Contactless payments have taken off amid the coronavirus pandemic, with consumers seeking out touch-free ways to pay. One of the world's most valuable fintechs is targeting that trend, looking to help companies distribute digital cards even if they aren't current customers. Marqeta, the card-issuing startup last valued at $4.3 billion, announced Tuesday it is now offering its digital card issuance tech to anyone. Described as ""tokenization-as-a-service,"" any company that wants to be able to issue digital cards can use Marqeta's platform to do so, even if they're not already using the startup to issue or process their physical cards. Tokenization is a critical security element in digital payments. Sensitive information like card numbers are swapped out for other identifiers, or, tokenized. ""Prior to this, we've worked primarily with customers where we were issuing the card and processing the cards as well,"" Kevin Doerr, chief product officer at Marqeta, told Business Insider. ""Now we've enabled customers who don't have that relationship with us to still take advantage of the functionality and services that our API layer presents."" Read more: PayPal's CFO explains why the payment giant is going against the grain and betting big on QR codes as the new way to pay in-store Historically, consumers have manually set up their cards on digital wallets after receiving a physical card.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2020-09-28 05:24:21-05:00,Pearce swaps FIS for TP ICAP,"TP ICAP appoints former FIS senior sales executive Ann-Marie Pearce, as its newest broker",FIS,en,SecuritiesLendingTimes
2020-09-25 12:35:53-05:00,FIS and The Clearing House Help Bring Real Time Payments to Small Banks - Finovate,"Financial services company FIS announced this week it has partnered with The Clearing House (TCH) in an effort to bring real-time payment processing and settlement to small-to-mid-sized banks and credit unions. FIS will help its core banking system clients quickly and cheaply connect to TCH’s RTP network, a payments infrastructure that enables instant payments settlement Read more…",FIS,en,Finovate
2020-09-24 04:20:13-05:00,Ripple Partner FIS Teams Up with The Clearing House to Set Up Quick Payments for US Banks,Ripple partner FIS teams up with The Clearing House to integrate a new real-time payments service for small and mid-sized US banks with two major ones beginning trials,FIS,en,U.Today
2020-09-23 08:00:00-05:00,Mastercard Expands its Digital First Card Program Amid Growing Demand for Digitally Driven Money Management Solutions,"PURCHASE, N.Y.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Directly addressing today’s generation, who does everything – from ordering meals to scheduling doctor’s appointments – on their mobile phones or online, Mastercard today announced the expansion of its Digital First Card Program in North America. Mastercard is partnering with payment processors including CoreCard, FIS, Fiserv, Galileo, i2c, Marqeta, PTS and TSYS, a Global Payments Company, to provide them with the foundational digital guidelines that will enable","FIS,FISV",en,Business Wire
2020-09-23 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Partners with The Clearing House to Bring Real-Time Payments to U.S. Financial Institutions,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--As consumers and businesses increasingly demand the speed and convenience of faster payment methods, financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) is teaming with The Clearing House to bring real-time payment processing and settlement to small-to-mid-sized banks and credit unions and their customers. FIS’ real-time payments managed service provides a complete, turnkey service for financial institutions to quickly and cost-effectively connect to the RTP® netwo",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-09-23 00:42:58-05:00,Hedge fund and private equity worlds collide to exploit credit opportunities,"Hedge fund and private equity worlds collide to exploit credit opportunities Submitted By James Williams | 23/09/2020 - 6:42am With the ripple effect of Covid-19 still being felt in the global economy, investment opportunities in high yield credit, and in particular distressed credit, have been numerous as investors seek out higher yield, at a commensurate higher risk. CNBC recently reported that Oak Hill Advisors, a USD42 billion investment manager that focuses on distressed credit, had noticed a lot of investor interest in the asset class. Oak Hill’s president William Bohnsack stated they had invested about USD2 billion to USD3 billion dollars during the March, April period. Private credit vehicles raised USD57 billion in the first half of 2020 according to research firm Preqin and with yield opportunities in structured credit and CLOs, as well as distressed credit, coming to the fore, the worlds of hedge fund and private equity investing are likely to converge. “This is an area of growth we’ve been seeing over the last couple of years,” comments Trevor Headley, Head of Hedge Fund Product Management at FIS Global. “We are seeing large specialist PE firms expanding their investment horizons on the debt side of the capital structure; whether that is distressed credit, syndicated loans, and structured credit.",FIS,en,Hedgeweek
2020-09-22 02:56:00-05:00,What Does Fidelity National's Debt Look Like?,"Over the past three months, shares of Fidelity National Info (NYSE: FIS) moved higher by 10.35%. Before we understand the importance of debt, let us look at …",FIS,en,Benzinga
2020-09-21 08:00:00-05:00,LoanDepot is considering going public on the heels of the August IPO of Quicken Loans' parent company,"Summary List Placement LoanDepot, a nonbank lender that offers mortgages and other direct-to-consumer loans, is considering an IPO at the end of the year, after nixing the idea several years ago, reports Bloomberg. Some insiders think it could be valued between $12 billion and $15 billion. LoanDepot will need to manage potential investors' expectations—it would be hard to pitch itself as a technology company—but its digital capabilities are a selling point. LoanDepot—with digital income, assets, and employment verification; algorithm-based loan options; and quick title clearance—presents a similar value proposition as Quicken for its digital mortgage process. At IPO, a big selling point for Quicken's parent company Rocket Cos. was its digitized mortgage process. But when it went public in August at a valuation of about $36 billion, Rocket Cos. failed to convince investors that it was a technology company, and fell well short of its about $40 billion target. Nonbank lenders have come to dominate the market for single-family purchase loans.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-09-18 09:06:00-05:00,Truist launched a venture capital arm as part of its promised investment in new technologies,"Summary List Placement Truist Ventures integrates both SunTrust's and BB&T's venture programs, and it will be led by a former private equity investor and venture capitalist, per a press release. Prior to merging as Truist, BB&T and SunTrust had invested in startups developing products for cloud-based core banking, consumer-facing payments, data management, and digital banking . Cloud-based core provider nCino, which is now public, is listed as a former portfolio company. This is a baby step in the bank's post-merger integration. In February 2019, soon after BB&T and SunTrust announced their merger, they committed to a $100 million ""technology and innovation"" budget and planned a technology hub in Charlotte, North Carolina. But the innovation center and associated venture arm are just two small components of the bank's $66 billion deal . Given the merger's many moving parts, its focus on technological innovation risks getting lost as the dust settles. In-house accelerators and direct investments in fintechs have quickly become the norm among big banks.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-09-16 10:12:00-05:00,New Banking as a Service startup raises capital for embedded banking,"Summary List Placement Swan , a French Banking as a Service (BaaS) startup geared toward nonfinancial companies, has raised a €5 million ($5.6 million) seed round, per TechCrunch. It will reportedly use the funds to meet regulatory requirements and acquire early customers for its platform. Swan recently received an e-money license from the French central bank and can now operate payments services, hold deposits, issue payment cards and international bank account numbers (IBANs), and open accounts. As part of its services, Swan will also handle identity verification, fraud detection, and risk assessment for new banking customers. With the platform, nonbanks could create bank accounts for limited purposes and issue virtual or physical cards. The service allows consumer brands to control both the customer experience and the wiring behind their services. Swan is selling ""embedded finance,"" a term for nonfinancial companies offering financial products and services to their customers while retaining complete control over the customer experience.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-09-16 08:38:00-05:00,Technisys Continues North American Expansion With the Hire of Michel Jacobs as Chief Sales Officer,"MIAMI , Sept. 16, 2020 /PRNewswire/ -- Technisys , the company behind the next-gen digital banking platform Cyberbank, has continued to demonstrate strong growth despite the COVID-19 crisis with 120 new hires, including the appointment of Michel Jacobs as chief sales officer. Jacobs will lead the company's sales efforts globally with a focus in the U.S. ""Technisys is proving itself as a world class digital banking platform provider and I'm thrilled to be joining the team,"" comments Jacobs. ""I believe that Technisys has a strong business model and a great opportunity to help more banks and FIs in North America … Full story available on Benzinga.com",FIS,en,Benzinga
2020-09-14 08:13:00-05:00,"Razer, gaming hardware maker, detours from its core business to build a bank","Summary List Placement Razer, best known as a company that sells hardware for computer gaming, is considering expanding its financial services presence to the US and Europe, per PYMNTS. It aims to serve ""the underserved youth and millennials segment,"" as well as entrepreneurs and small businesses. Early this year, the California-based company applied for a banking license in Singapore, where it had already entered financial services with a virtual wallet and merchant services. Razer views its financial business as its key growth initiative outside of cloud-based gaming. Elbowing into neobank territory is risky for a new entrant. Razer's payments services make sense within the gaming world as platforms for in-game commerce, and to some extent, as affinity programs for the company's customers and merchants that want to sell related content and services. But the ""Youth Bank'' it plans to start and grow on the strength of its brand is an exceptional departure from its core business. With Razer's global ambitions, it would face over two dozen established neobanks in a market that's grossly unprofitable.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-09-14 08:00:00-05:00,"TCH's real-time payments growth puts it in competition with the Fed, Mastercard, and Visa","Summary List Placement The Clearing House's (TCH's) real-time payments (RTP) network now directly reaches 56% of US demand deposit accounts (DDAs) through its roster of financial institutions (FIs), per a press release. And the network's capabilities can be made available to a total of 70% of US DDAs because many FIs that aren't a part of the RTP network can join via banking technology providers like ACI Worldwide and Jack Henry that have already partnered with TCH, a bank-owned payment system operator. TCH claims it's set to add over 150 banks and credit unions to its network in the next few months, so it's seemingly on its way to expanding further. TCH's RTP network could quickly gain adoption during the pandemic because FIs may want to provide SMBs and consumers with fast access to funds. Many SMBs have faced a cash crunch during the pandemic, while consumers have dealt with unemployment and drops in income, meaning both groups need to be able to access the funds they have quickly. ",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-09-11 09:28:00-05:00,nCino eludes profits as it pushes to upset technology vendors,"Summary List Placement nCino, the upstart Software-as-a-Service (SaaS) core provider for financial institutions (FIs), beat analyst expectations in its first quarterly report since it went public in July. Revenues were up 52% year-over-year to $48.8 million, but its operating loss doubled to $15.7 million. More importantly though, recurring revenues central to its business model—subscriptions—were up 70%, representing 80% of its total revenues for the quarter. nCino is a small fry in a space dominated by incumbent core providers. nCino has wide ambitions: It markets itself to community banks and credit unions as well as to FIs with more than $10 billion in assets. But it's dwarfed by the industry heavyweights: In the most recent quarter, Fiserv reported revenues of $7.2 billion and FIS reported $3.0 billion—after both expanded their reaches further by swallowing enormous acquisitions. Even the much smaller Jack Henry reported revenues of $411 million, eight times higher than nCino's. The industry moves too slowly for there to have been a wide-scale shift away from on-premise point solutions.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2020-09-09 15:46:00-05:00,Artificial Intelligence in Financial Services: Applications and benefits of AI in finance,"Summary List Placement Artificial intelligence (AI) in finance encompasses everything from chatbot assistants to fraud detection and task automation. Most banks (80%) are highly aware of the potential benefits presented by AI, according to Insider Intelligence's AI in Banking report. The decision for financial institutions (FIs) to adopt AI will be accelerated by technological advancement, increased user acceptance, and shifting regulatory frameworks. Banks using AI can vastly improve the customer experience by offering 24/7 access to their accounts and financial advice services. Applications of AI in Financial Services With key business benefits and pressure from tech savvy consumers top of mind, AI is being implemented by FIs across every financial service⁠—here's how: AI in Personal Finance Consumers are hungry for financial independence, and providing the ability to manage one's financial health is the driving force behind adoption of AI in personal finance . Whether offering 24/7 financial guidance via built-in chatbots or personalizing insights for wealth management solutions, AI is a necessity for any financial institution looking to be a top player in the industry.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-09-04 01:10:33-05:00,The Wolfsberg Group – Developing an Effective AML/CTF Programme,"As of August 2020, Wolfsberg Group has released a statement encouraging authorities to adopt the FATF guidelines in accordance to mitigating the risk of AML (Anti-Money Laundering) and to implement appropriate measures in CTF (Combatting Terrorism Financing). Wolfsberg Group has outlined the following key procedures to be undertaken: Complying with AML/CTF laws and regulations. Providing highly useful information to relevant government agencies in defined priority areas. Establishing a reasonable and risk-based set of controls to mitigate the risks of a Financial Institution (FI) being used to facilitate illicit activity. In addition to the general guidance provided, Wolfsberg Group has pinpointed their focus on Financial Institutions (FIs), detailing five key areas to help improve their AML/CTF programs: Assess Risk in Defined Priority Areas FIs should ensure they are consulting all resources in identifying risk, as opposed to just relying on their countries jurisdictions to provide transparency on risk in financial crime areas.",FIS,en,IHS Markit
2020-09-03 08:41:00-05:00,Plaid Exchange's upgrade puts personal financial management in new light,"Summary List Placement Plaid unveiled a real-time account update feature for its Plaid Exchange platform, which the company launched in May. The iteration reduces to seconds the time it takes financial data to reach a fintech from a financial institution (FI). Exchange helps banks build their own APIs that tie into Plaid's established network of fintechs, such as Venmo, Robinhood, Coinbase, and Square's Cash App. This iteration of Plaid Exchange makes it more efficient for banks to output and fintechs to access that data. The Exchange model is as much about giving FIs control as helping fintechs utilize customer-permissioned data. Banks and other financial companies have been wary of sharing customer-permissioned data with fintechs. Exchange is attractive to FIs because, by building APIs in-house, they can better control the flow of customers' financial data to fintechs. The original Plaid API and its competitors depend on screen scraping, which FIs consider a threat to data security and customer privacy.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-09-03 02:00:00-05:00,Swedish Export Credit Corporation Partners with FIS to Digitalize Its Commercial Lending Platform,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--The Swedish Export Credit Corporation (SEK), which finances Swedish exporters, their subsidiaries, and foreign customers, has chosen financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) to digitize and modernize its commercial lending platform to enhance service to its clients and streamline costs. Owned and operated by the government of Sweden, SEK is chartered with enhancing the competitiveness of the country’s export industry by ensuring access to sustainable cre",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-09-02 15:30:00-05:00,FIS to Present at Upcoming Conferences,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS® (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, will present on Wed., Sept. 9, 2020, at the KeyBanc Capital Markets’ Future of Technology Series at 2:40 p.m. (EDT), Tue., Sept. 15, 2020, at the Deutsche Bank's Virtual Technology Conference at 2:40 p.m. (EDT) and Thurs., Sept. 17, 2020 at the virtual Autonomous Future of Commerce Symposium at 11:00 a.m. (EDT). A live audio webcast, as well as a replay, will be accessible from the Investor",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-09-02 07:00:00-05:00,European Asset Servicing Leader CACEIS Streamlines International Payments with FIS Platform,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) announced today that it has signed a long-term agreement with CACEIS, jointly owned by Credit Agricole S.A. and Santander, to provide the asset servicing firm with an enhanced payment hub to industrialize payment operations, reduce processing costs and provide a smooth payment experience. With custodial assets of € 3.9 trillion, CACEIS is a leading provider of execution, clearing, securities lending, custody and f",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-08-26 08:06:00-05:00,T-Mobile is extending its checking account offering to Sprint customers,"T-Mobile extends its checking account offering to Sprint customers. This move will expand the captive audience for BankMobile's white-labeled checking account product and showcasing a partnership style that keeps BaaS providers and customers out of direct competition. Insider Intelligence publishes hundreds of research reports, charts, and forecasts on the Banking industry with the Banking Briefing. You can learn more about subscribing here. T-Mobile will allow legacy Sprint customers to sign up for its T-Mobile Money service, which is built on BankMobile's white-labeled checking account platform, per CNET. The announcement comes several months after T-Mobile completed its merger with Sprint, and effectively adds millions to the captive audience for T-Mobile's checking account: The combined company reported 98.3 million total customers at the end of Q2 2020, an increase from 86.0 million at the end of 2019, despite shedding several million customers after making other changes to the business.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-08-21 15:13:12-05:00,Weekly Wrap: Examining the state of U.S. open banking and FIs eye partnerships [VIDEO],"More than 70% of executives predicted that spending on banking innovation will increase in the next two years and that the industry is poised for growth, according to a recent INV Fintech survey. Many financial institutions will be looking for fintech partnerships to accelerate that development, with 76% reporting that they will seek out more […]",FIS,en,Bank Innovation
2020-08-19 01:05:14-05:00,MAS «Working With FIs to Develop Strong Leadership Pipeline»,"The managing director of the Monetary Authority of Singapore (MAS) has said that protecting and growing Singaporean jobs, especially in current economic conditions, is a «top priority.»",FIS,en,Finews Asia
2020-08-18 14:50:05-05:00,FIS Unveils Subscription Model for Core Banking,Fintech giant FIS has adopted the subscription model that has proven popular in selling everything from wine to digital media to diapers. The Florida-based company launched a subscription core banking solution today called ClearEdge. ClearEdge is geared specifically to serve community banks and offers a bundle of technologies to help them modernize their operations and Read more… The post FIS Unveils Subscription Model for Core Banking appeared first on Finovate .,FIS,en,Finovate
2020-08-18 10:47:00-05:00,FIS launches core banking subscription model for community banks,"As U.S. community banks position themselves for success in a post-pandemic marketplace, financial technology leader FIS (NYSE: FIS) today announced a new subscription-based core banking solution that speeds and simplifies access to the advanced technology these banks need to compete and better serve the changing needs of their customers.",FIS,en,Finextra Research
2020-08-18 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Speeds Access to Advanced Technology for Community Banks with New ClearEdge Solution,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--As U.S. community banks position themselves for success in a post-pandemic marketplace, financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) today announced a new subscription-based core banking solution that speeds and simplifies access to the advanced technology these banks need to compete and better serve the changing needs of their customers. Called ClearEdge, the new solution offers community banks a pre-integrated, comprehensive bundle of technologies for oper",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-08-16 12:00:00-05:00,This Is What Hedge Funds Bought And Sold In The Second Quarter,"This Is What Hedge Funds Bought And Sold In The Second Quarter Tyler Durden Sun, 08/16/2020 - 13:00 In addition to the widely publicized changes in Berkshire Hathaway's portfolio, where as we previously reported Warren Buffett dumped a material amount of his bank holdings in addition to completely selling out of airlines, while making his first ever foray into precious metals with a new $ 563MM stake in Barrick Gold , there were other quite notable changes in hedge fund portfolios during Q2 as disclosed in the barrage of 13Fs filed on Friday. As Bloomberg recaps, the 13F filings show that even more hedge funds leaned in to the stay-at-home trade amid the Covid-19 pandemic. Of note, Home Depot was a top new buy for Balyasny Asset Management, while Pershing Square Capital Management and Adage Capital Partners boosted stakes in Lowe’s. Coatue Management boosted its stakes in Peloton and Zoom Video Communications. Netflix was one notable exception as Appaloosa, D1 Capital Partners and Viking Global Investors cut their stakes.","FIS,FISV",en,Zero Hedge
2020-08-07 15:39:42-05:00,FIs and fintechs innovate with an eye on SMBs,"At the start of the year, Bank Innovation predicted, “if 2019 was the year of the challenger bank, 2020 will be the year payments companies move closer to bank territory.” But as 2020 would have it, not much is what it seemed at the beginning of the year, with the coronavirus pandemic disrupting the fintech […]",FIS,en,Bank Innovation
2020-08-05 06:10:20-05:00,Open banking: the lucrative benefits for smaller FIs and fintechs (VB Live),"One of the biggest changes coming with open banking is in how transaction data from user end accounts gets aggregated, using standardized APIs.""",FIS,en,VentureBeat
2020-08-04 06:00:00-05:00,FIS Reports Second Quarter 2020 Results,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE:FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today reported its second quarter 2020 results. Second Quarter 2020 Results On a GAAP basis, revenue increased 40% to $2,962 million, primarily driven by the July 31, 2019 acquisition of Worldpay, Inc. (Worldpay). Net earnings attributable to common stockholders was $19 million or $0.03 per diluted share. On an organic basis, revenue decreased 7% compared to the prior year period, primarily d",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-07-24 23:19:46-05:00,"Nearly dozen brokerages, FIs in race to be LIC IPO advisor","In the fray big names include Citigroup, CLSA, Credit Suisse, Deloitte India, SBI Capital.",FIS,en,Economic Times India
2020-07-23 16:02:00-05:00,FIS Announces Quarterly Dividend,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS® (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today announced a regular quarterly dividend of $0.35 per common share. The dividend is payable on Sept. 25, 2020, to shareholders of record as of close of business on Sept. 11, 2020. About FIS FIS is a leading provider of technology solutions for merchants, banks and capital markets firms globally. Our more than 55,000 people are dedicated to advancing the way the world pays, banks and inve",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-07-23 08:21:14-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services : The #1 reason private equity teams feel unprepared for board meetings. | MarketScreener,"These days, the sheer amount of information at our fingertips at any given moment is mind-blowing. With a few taps and swipes, you can get a report on how well you've been sleeping, track your… | July 23, 2020",FIS,en,MarketScreener
2020-07-09 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Launches Ethos Data Ecosystem Unlocking Data Insights,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS® (NYSE: FIS) today announced Ethos, an innovative new data ecosystem that gives clients the benefit of a unified view of data across their entire enterprise. Through a single point of access, clients will see data from across multiple channels using fully integrated tools that power data-driven insights and actions. Among its capabilities, Ethos will help financial institutions automate reporting, reduce operational costs, and mitigate risk while streaml",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-07-08 09:04:19-05:00,"Fintech investors see more red tape for the booming payments space following the Wirecard scandal, and say that costs to comply could crimp newcomers' growth","Investors expect greater scrutiny from regulators around the payments space in the wake of the Wirecard accounting scandal. They think the payments industry could see more consolidation, with only fintechs with the most funding able to meet stricter regulatory requirements. Incumbents could also capture back market share from startups, as customers look to move to more established players. For more stories like this, sign up here for our Wall Street Insider newsletter. Fintech investors are bracing for the possibility of stricter regulations for the payments space in light of the Wirecard scandal , and some say there could be knock-on effects to the red-hot industry. As the dust settles on the accounting fraud uncovered at German payments giant Wirecard , which filed for insolvency after revealing it couldn't account for $2 billion in cash reserves on its balance sheet, industry insiders have begun to assess what impact the high-profile scandal will have on the wider payments industry.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2020-07-07 15:30:00-05:00,"FIS to Report Second Quarter Earnings on August 4, 2020","JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS® (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, will announce its second quarter 2020 financial results on Tues., August 4, 2020, prior to market open. The company will sponsor a live webcast of its earnings conference call with the investment community beginning at 8:30 a.m. (EDT) the same day. To access the webcast, go to the Investor Relations section of FIS’ homepage, www.fisglobal.com. A replay will be available after the conclusion",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-07-02 11:10:29-05:00,Alpine skiing: World Championships in Italy confirmed for 2021,"MILAN: The Alpine skiing World Championships in Cortina d'Ampezzo will take place in February 2021 as originally scheduled, the International Ski Federation (FIS) said on Thursday. In May the Italian winter sports federation (FISI) had asked to postpone the event by a year due to uncertainties …","FIS,FISI",en,Channel NewsAsia
2020-07-01 12:16:00-05:00,People's United Bank Bolsters Suite of Treasury Management Technology with Integrated Payables and Invoice-to-Pay Solutions,"BRIDGEPORT, Conn. , July 1, 2020 /PRNewswire/ -- People's United Bank , N.A., a subsidiary of People's United Financial, Inc. (NASDAQ: PBCT ), has expanded its Treasury Management Payment offering, partnering with FIS and MineralTree to bring to market two best-in-class AP Automation solutions that will replace traditionally paper-based processes with simple, secure digital capabilities for Commercial Banking clients. These additions are part of People's United's strategy to augment the client experience through the continued expansion of personalized technology across business lines. ""We are excited … Full story available on Benzinga.com",FIS,en,Benzinga Feeds
2020-06-30 14:53:11-05:00,Stratyfy Earns Spot in FIS Fintech Accelerator Incoming Cohort,"Predictive analytics innovator Stratyfy is one of ten companies selected to participate in the incoming cohort of FIS’ 2020 Fintech Accelerator program. “The ten companies selected for the fifth year of FIS’ Accelerator program bring a wealth of promising ideas and technologies,” FIS Chief Growth Officer Asif Ramji said. “We look forward to working with Read more… The post Stratyfy Earns Spot in FIS Fintech Accelerator Incoming Cohort appeared first on Finovate .",FIS,en,Finovate
2020-06-30 14:16:53-05:00,A partner at Point72 Ventures is betting the next wave of fintech disruption will target back-end tech that's dominated by giants like FIS and Fiserv,"A partner at Point72 Ventures, the VC arm of Steve Cohen's hedge fund, expects the next wave of fintech disruption to happen in the less publicized back-end tech that powers big banks. Infrastructure giants like FIS and Fiserv have dominated the banking infrastructure space for decades, but fintechs are looking for ways to reimagine these core banking services. ""They are all, as it currently stands, very good businesses with large customer bases who trust them, but the fact of the matter is they've fallen behind on technology,"" Tripp Shriner, partner at Point72 Ventures, told Business Insider. Shriner isn't alone in his prediction. Goldman's investment banking head of fintech also says that the next trend to watch in fintech is players that focus on banks' core, often dated, infrastructure. Visit Business Insider's homepage for more stories . Depending on whom you ask, fintech is, at any point in time, unbundling or rebundling financial services. An unbundling fintech might put a tech-forward twist on a particular product or service, like checking accounts or personal financial management.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2020-06-30 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Selects Ten Startups for 2020 Fintech Accelerator Program,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) and The Venture Center have announced the ten companies selected to participate in the 2020 FIS Fintech Accelerator program. In its fifth year, the FIS Fintech Accelerator program is focused on identifying and fostering startup financial technology firms with promising, high-potential technologies that advance the way the world pays, banks and invests. The 2020 program received applications from fintech companies",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-06-25 08:00:00-05:00,"Mastercard, FIS, and Open Lending Named NAFCU Services Innovation Award Winners","ARLINGTON, Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)-- #cupreferred--NAFCU Services announces Mastercard, FIS, and Open Lending as the winners of the 2020 Innovation Awards.",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-06-25 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Teams with FICO on Advanced Anti-Money Laundering Solution For U.S. Financial Institutions,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.,--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Technology leader FIS® (NYSE: FIS) announced today that it is teaming with FICO®, a leader in predictive analytics and financial crime prevention, to build an advanced anti-money laundering (AML) solution that will help North American financial institutions keep ahead of increasingly sophisticated money launderers and other financial criminals. Money laundering is a growing problem around the world. In the U.S. alone, domestic financial crime generates an e",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-06-25 06:00:00-05:00,"The Best Bank for You, 2020","If you're in the market for a new bank, your priorities may be shifting as the U.S. faces a recession and grapples with the continuing effects of the coronavirus pandemic. The interest paid on bank accounts has declined sharply since the Federal Reserve slashed short-term rates earlier this year. At the same time, the personal savings rate among consumers hit a record 33% in April, according to the U.S. Bureau of Economic Analysis , and bank deposits are on the rise. 32 Ways to Earn Up to 9% on Your Money Now Another change: Going to a branch is less than desirable when social distancing is the norm. Branch visits in many areas were down by 30% to 40% this spring, according to research firm Novantas , and many banks closed their lobbies or reduced hours to minimize the spread of COVID-19. Only 45% of customers expect to go back to their regular branch activities after social distancing ends, according to a Novantas survey. As Americans began receiving government stimulus checks in April, new registrations for bank mobile apps increased by about 200%, and bank app usage more than doubled at one point, according to financial-technology company FIS .",FIS,en,Kiplinger Washington Editors
2020-06-17 13:31:13-05:00,Worldpay from FIS enables mobile bank payments for European merchants,No summary available.,FIS,en,Mobile Payments Today
2020-06-15 05:01:00-05:00,"A MENA region first: Zain Group joins Hedera Governing Council to create a safer, fairer, more secure internet","KUWAIT CITY , June 15, 2020 /PRNewswire/ -- Zain Group [Kuwait Stock Exchange (stock ticker: ZAIN)] the leading mobile telecom innovator serving 49.5 million customers in eight markets across the Middle East and Africa today announces it is joining the highly innovative Hedera Governing Council. Zain is the first company from the Middle East region to participate on the Council, joining a list of prestigious global innovators including Boeing, Deutsche Telekom, DLA Piper, FIS (WorldPay), Google, IBM, LG Electronics, Magalu, Nomura, Swirlds, Swisscom Blockchain, Tata Communications, University College London, and Wipro. Hedera Hashgraph provides a next-generation form of distributed consensus that is faster, fairer and more secure than traditional blockchains. It offers a new way for people or organizations who do not know or trust each other to securely collaborate and transact online without the need for a trusted intermediary. Through its participation on the Hedera Council, Zain Group will gain extensive early insights into the trends and applications in the distributed ledger technology (DLT) space and will be able to assess opportunities to develop services within its own field of operation.",FIS,en,Benzinga Feeds
2020-06-12 13:07:25-05:00,FIs line up to roll out stand-alone apps with HTMA,"First Bank is the latest in a number of community banks and credit unions to roll out stand-alone apps through the Ann Arbor, Mich.-based HT Mobile Apps (HTMA). Through the startup, the bank, which has just over $6 billion in assets, launched a stand-alone savings app and a financial literacy app for children this week. […]",FIS,en,Bank Innovation
2020-06-12 07:00:00-05:00,Jeffrey A. Goldstein Joins FIS Board of Directors,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS® (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today announced that Jeffrey A. Goldstein has joined the company’s Board of Directors. Mr. Goldstein is a Senior Advisor to Canapi Ventures, a venture capital firm, and Advisor Emeritus at Hellman & Friedman LLC, a private equity firm. He was the Chief Executive Officer of SpringHarbor Financial Group LLC from December 2016 through 2018. Mr. Goldstein was a Managing Director at Hellman &",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-06-11 23:00:00-05:00,"FINTECH MEGADEALS: How FIS-Worldpay, Fiserv-First Data, and Global Payments-TSYS will reshape the payments landscape","This is a preview of Fintech Megadeals research report from Business Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. Business Insider Intelligence offers even more fintech coverage with Fintech Pro. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing finance news and analysis to your inbox. Mergers and acquisitions (M&As) in the payments industry reached a record high in 2019. M&A deals spiked from $31.8 billion in H1 2018 to a total of $116.6 billion in H1 2019, per Dealogic. Three deals made up the majority of funding activity: Fiserv bought First Data for $22 billion, FIS acquired Worldpay for $43 billion, and Global Payments scooped up TSYS for $21.5 billion. Of note, although these deals didn't close until the back half of the year, Dealogic includes the activity in H1 2019's total, when the deals were presented; Dealogic's deal values also differ slightly from the closing values. The inking of three deals of this magnitude in such a short period highlights an important development in the payments space — the need to consolidate.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2020-06-11 11:32:00-05:00,"THE DIGITAL BANKING ECOSYSTEM: These are the key players, biggest shifts, and trends driving short- and long-term growth in one of the world's largest industries","This is a preview of Digital Banking Ecosystem research report from Business Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. Business Insider Intelligence offers even more fintech coverage with Banking Pro. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing finance news and analysis to your inbox. The banking industry is in the grips of an identity crisis. Leaders of the world's largest banks — such as Citi, BBVA, and Goldman Sachs — have begun describing themselves as technology companies with banking licenses. However, this description is still aspirational. Executing the vision will require billions of dollars in investments, the restructuring of teams, a reimagining of the entire banking technology stack, and the adoption of a far more customer-centric business view. The stakes of failing to transform are high: Accenture projects that 35% of all bank revenues could be at risk from more tech-savvy competitors like fintechs as soon as 2020 for incumbents that fail to up their game. As a result, a wave of digital transformation is now sweeping the banking industry, as incumbents shore up against consumer demand and competitive pressures.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2020-06-11 07:00:00-05:00,Aite Group Names FIS Best-in-Class Provider for its Investment Accounting System,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) has been named a best-in-class provider for its InvestOne investment accounting system by leading global research firm Aite Group. In its new report, “Aite Matrix Evaluation: Investment and Fund Accounting Systems,” Aite Group placed FIS in the Best-in-Class Vendors category in the Investment and Fund Accounting Aite Matrix. Vendors are evaluated based on vendor stability, client strength, client service and produ",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-06-11 00:02:00-05:00,BLOCKCHAIN IN BANKING: An inside look at four banks' early blockchain successes and failures,"This is a preview of the Blockchain in Banking research report from Business Insider Intelligence. 14-Day Risk Free Trial: Get full access to this and all Fintech industry research reports. Since its emergence at the start of the decade, blockchain has been heralded as one of the most transformative technologies for financial services. Blockchain hype has led financial institutions (FIs) to pour money into the space and into distributed ledger technology more broadly: about $1.7 billion annually as of 2018, per research from Greenwich Associates cited by Bloomberg. Despite the hype, sentiment around the technology has grown increasingly skeptical as FIs struggle to realize the value of their investments. Incumbents have shuttered some early experiments, and FI execs are beginning to discuss blockchain's prospects in bearish terms. Key difficulties include scaling the technology for commercial application, ongoing regulatory uncertainty, and the difficulty of bringing together competing participants.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-06-09 23:00:00-05:00,THE BUY BUTTON REPORT: The introduction of SRC will turn the online retail payments industry on its head — here's how payments players can win in the new checkout landscape,"This is a preview of The Buy Button research report from Business Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. Business Insider Intelligence offers even more consumer coverage with Payments & Commerce Pro. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing payments and commerce news and analysis to your inbox. Payments firms have introduced buy buttons to streamline the online checkout process, but so many have done so that it can have the opposite effect. This led companies to introduce buy buttons so consumers could skip the cumbersome, labor-intensive steps required to input contact and payment information online, and to allow them to shop online more freely. But the array of options has become overwhelming. Firms such as Mastercard, Visa, Apple, Amazon, Walmart, point-of-sale (POS) financing providers, and many more have developed buy buttons for their payment methods. This glut undercuts the convenience buy buttons are meant to introduce, as consumers don't know which option will be available where, and they must search crowded checkout pages for their desired option.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-06-09 13:02:00-05:00,THE ONLINE MORTGAGE LENDING REPORT: How banks are striking back against Quicken Loans and other digital-first lenders in the $9 trillion US mortgage market,"This is a preview of THE ONLINE MORTGAGE LENDING REPORT from Business Insider Intelligence. 14-Day Risk Free Trial: Get full access to this and all Fintech industry research reports. Despite the mortgage space representing the largest US lending market — with debt sitting at $9.2 trillion — it's been the slowest to digitize, and incumbents have had little incentive to remove friction from the customer application process. The customer experience has been hampered by a time-consuming process that requires spending hours filling out an application and gathering documents, a lack of transparency about the status of the process, and uncertainty about what outstanding documentation could be requested later. And with no viable challengers to the status quo, incumbent lenders had little reason to overhaul this process. But Quicken Loans turned the mortgage industry on its head with the introduction of Rocket Mortgage, an online mortgage application that takes less than 10 minutes to complete, in November 2015.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-06-04 07:30:00-05:00,Financial Institution Cardholders Can Access Available Credit Through Their Bank Accounts with New Solution from Fiserv,"BROOKFIELD, Wis.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Consumers and small businesses impacted by COVID-19 can access funds from existing credit lines through their FIs with a new solution from Fiserv.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Wire
2020-06-03 04:00:00-05:00,"As Cryptocurrency Use Grows, Worldpay from FIS Helps Crypto Brokers and Exchanges with New Chargeback Indemnification Service from Forter","JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today announced Fraud Freedom, a new chargeback indemnification service designed for cryptocurrency brokers and exchanges. Worldpay’s Fraud Freedom service helps crypto brokers and exchanges optimize payment conversion and authorization rates while providing indemnification from Forter, the leading eCommerce fraud prevention provider.1 The cryptocurrency market continues to grow rapidly foll",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-06-02 22:59:43-05:00,How to apply for Rs 3-lakh cr collateral free loan,"By Rishi MehraUnveiling the first tranche of economic stimulus to help businesses during the Covid-19 pandemic, Finance Minister Nirmala Sitharaman on May 13 announced collateral-free loans up to Rs 3 lakh crore backed by government guarantee. Meant to help businesses suffering from a severe cash crunch, the Government has since the announcement come out with the guidelines on how the scheme will operate. Based largely on the FAQs released by the National Credit Guarantee Trustee Company (NCGTC), here are the key details of the scheme. What are the details of the Collateral free MSME loans?The 100% collateral-free MSME loan is being called the Emergency Credit Line Guarantee Scheme (ECLGS), which is being provided by the National Credit Guarantee Trustee Company (NCGTC) to banks, NBFCs and Financial Institutions (FIs). According this scheme, every eligible MSME or business enterprise, gets a pre-approved sanction limit of up to 20% of loan outstanding as on 29th February, 2020. This is in the form of additional working capital term loan facility (in case of banks and Financial Institutions), and additional term loan facility (in case of NBFCs).",FIS,en,Economic Times India
2020-05-29 14:20:04-05:00,Payments industry veteran Martire to seek $375 million for investment vehicle: source,"Former Fidelity National Information Services Chief Executive Frank Martire is preparing to seek around $375 million in a U.S. initial public offering for a new acquisition company, a person familiar with the matter said on Friday.",FIS,en,Reuters
2020-05-29 03:03:43-05:00,What Legacy FIs Miss About The Need For Cloud-Based Infrastructure,"Financial institutions (FIs) have been adapting their platforms and technologies to better suit the needs of more digital consumers for decades, but the coronavirus has placed new importance and pressure on accelerating these efforts. Allowing customers uninterrupted access to their online financial accounts and processing digital payments quickly is critical during this time as brick-and-mortar […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-05-28 09:26:33-05:00,Germany’s KfW teams with FIS to transform risk management operations,"KfW, one of the largest banks in Germany, has overhauled its risk management operations with a new platform powered by FIS technology",FIS,en,SecuritiesLendingTimes
2020-05-28 04:51:54-05:00,FIS enhances risk management operations for German bank KfW,FIS announced today that German bank KfW has completed a multi-year project for enhancing its risk management operations using FIS' technologies.,FIS,en,IBSintelligence
2020-05-28 04:37:00-05:00,German Banking Leader KfW Teams with FIS to Transform Risk Management Operation | Fintech Finance,"Financial technology leader FIS announced today that KfW, one of the largest banks in Germany, has successfully completed a multi-year project to transform its…",FIS,en,Fintech Finance
2020-05-27 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Delivers “EPIC” Productivity and Automation Tools for Managing a Remote Workforce,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) today announced Enterprise Productivity, Intelligence & Compliance (EPIC™), a modular, desktop-based solution that helps financial institutions and businesses enhance the efficiency of their global operations while managing an increasingly remote workforce. The COVID-19 crisis has created a host of operational challenges for organizations, requiring them to modify their business plans and invest in technologie",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-05-27 03:03:56-05:00,FIs Or FinTechs: Who Will Power Banking’s Big Digital Shift?,"The pandemic has accelerated the digital roadmap for everyone in financial services, giving rise to more innovation in the past few months than had been seen over the course of several years. And according to five observers across the spectrum of traditional financial institutions (FIs), payment networks and digital-only banks, opportunities are there for digital-first […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-05-26 07:00:00-05:00,Chartis Names FIS as Category Leader for Credit Value Adjustment Solutions,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) has been named a category leader for its credit risk analytics solutions by leading industry research house Chartis Research. In its new report, “Technology Solutions for Credit Risk 2.0: Credit Risk Analytics, 2020,” Chartis placed FIS in the “Category Leaders” section of the RiskTech Quadrant® for CVA solutions. Vendors are assessed according to the completeness of their offerings as well as their market potenti",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-05-22 07:00:42-05:00,How Banks Can Guide FinTechs Through Their First Economic Downturn,"From competitors to collaborators, the FinTech boom introduced a field of opportunity for traditional financial institutions to team up with an industry newcomer to become more agile and modern with their own product offerings. While FinTechs are, in many ways, useful allies to banks, traditional FIs can also be a critical partner to FinTechs that […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-05-21 08:14:41-05:00,FIS supports school lunch during COVID-19 pandemic,No summary available.,FIS,en,Mobile Payments Today
2020-05-21 07:17:00-05:00,RBC pinpoints 11 stocks loved by hedge funds that have beaten the market during both the coronavirus collapse and its subsequent recovery,"RBC's Lori Calvasina tracked the top holdings of hedge funds at the end of the first quarter and found that many were playing defense with investments in mega-cap growth stocks. Those hedge fund favorites have held up better than the rest of the market this year, and some have been outperformers since stocks began to rally in late March. Here is a group of 11 tech, communication, and healthcare stocks that are popular with hedge funds and are outperforming over both of those time periods. Visit Business Insider's homepage for more stories . Wall Street terms like ""growth stocks"" and ""defensive stocks"" are thrown around so much it's easy to assume they have static meanings everyone agrees on. RBC Capital Markets has some evidence that the most successful growth stocks in recent history have become the defensive stocks of today. It's a shift being driven by some of the world's biggest investors, and it's one reason a number of mega-cap internet and tech companies performed well when the market plunged in February and March.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-05-21 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Supports U.S. States and Territories in Providing Critical Lunch Funding to Families of School-Age Children,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial services technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) announced today that it is supporting U.S. states and territories under the U.S. Government’s Families First Coronavirus Response Act (FFCRA) to deliver needed lunch and food benefits to families of school-age children who have been impacted by school closures due to the current health crisis. In addition to distributing electronic benefits transfer (EBT) cards that can be used by participating families f",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-05-21 03:00:38-05:00,How PNC Is Fighting Pandemic-Fueled Financial Crime,"Financial crime is a never-ending concern for banks, credit unions (CUs) and other financial institutions (FIs), with trillions of dollars and untold terabytes of personal information stolen every year. Bad actors deploy a staggeringly diverse array of tactics to exact their crimes, ranging from impersonating bank officials to unleashing high-tech botnets. FIs are working on […]",FIS,en,PYMNTS
2020-05-20 08:05:00-05:00,"The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: Facebook, Johnson & Johnson, Fidelity National Information Services, Alibaba and Bristol-Myers Squibb","The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: Facebook, Johnson & Johnson, Fidelity National Information Services, Alibaba and Bristol-Myers Squibb",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2020-05-19 17:54:54-05:00,Plaid debuts open banking platform for FIs,"Data aggregator Plaid has launched an open-banking platform for lenders in a bid to promote the use of APIs and secure data exchange among financial institutions, regardless of their size, the company announced today. Plaid Exchange allows lenders and wealth management firms to manage the secure data connectivity of their customers’ financial lives, even if […]",FIS,en,Bank Innovation
2020-05-19 14:38:00-05:00,Raisin Launches Savings-as-a-Service Solution in the U.S.,"European wealth management firm Raisin is bringing its Savings-as-a-Service solution to the U.S. The new offering, the first U.S.-based product from the Berlin-based fintech, will enable banks and credit unions to provide private-banking services typically not available to the average banking customer. Foremost, FIs that partner with Raisin will be able to leverage the company’s Read more… The post Raisin Launches Savings-as-a-Service Solution in the U.S. appeared first on Finovate .",FIS,en,Finovate
2020-05-19 07:00:00-05:00,Manage Your Business On the Go with iQ Now from FIS,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--As merchants around the world grapple with the impact of COVID-19 on their operations, financial services technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) has launched iQ Now, a new mobile app for Worldpay’s small- and medium-sized businesses (SMBs) that delivers actionable insights into the health of the business. Available for Apple and Android devices, the Worldpay iQ Now app enables business owners to monitor performance on the go from their mobile devices. Unlike oth",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-05-19 00:00:00-05:00,Government should fund sport now to prevent need for reboot - FIS CEO,'For the government to support the sporting clubs and organisations now would cost an awful lot less than to reboot them post-Covid 19',FIS,en,Irish Mirror
2020-05-16 12:00:00-05:00,Here Is What Hedge Funds Bought And Sold In The Q1 Chaos: Full 13F Summary,"Here Is What Hedge Funds Bought And Sold In The Q1 Chaos: Full 13F Summary Tyler Durden Sat, 05/16/2020 - 13:00 Amid a selling panic that at times surpassed the liquidation observed during both the financial crisis and the great depression, hedge funds were either paralyzed watching their P&L collapse or were busy selling as sentiment vaporized, and has yet to come back as the near record-low hedge fund beta to the S&P indicates… ... but a handful bucked the trend, and loaded up on what BofA has dubbed a ""reopening portfolio"" of so-called quaratine stocks. As a result stocks such as Netflix, Peloton (which Citron infamously said to short just two months ago much to the amusement of the "" Peloton girl""), Amazon.com and Zoom were some of the most sought-after names in the first quarter, according to the latest round of 13F filings, with investors such as Jim Simons, Stan Druckenmiller, George Soros and Philippe Laffont all piling into these stocks. It was a good trade: each of the four stocks has soared double-digits as people hunkered down and reverted to television binging, at-home workouts, online shopping and video chatting.","FIS,FISV",en,Zero Hedge
2020-05-14 13:22:00-05:00,"The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: SAP, Thermo Fisher, TOTAL, 3M and FIS","The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: SAP, Thermo Fisher, TOTAL, 3M and FIS",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2020-05-14 08:46:00-05:00,Members Exchange secured $65 million to take on incumbent stock exchange firms,"Business Insider Intelligence and eMarketer are now Insider Intelligence , a digitally-focused research company from Insider Inc. Learn more about what we offer. This story was delivered to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Briefing subscribers earlier this morning. To get this story plus others to your inbox each day, hours before they're published on Business Insider, click here. The US-based equities exchange has announced a $65 million strategic financing round led by new investors BlackRock and Wells Fargo, which join existing investors JPMorgan and Goldman Sachs, among others, per Business Wire. This brings total funding to date to in excess of $135 million. Members Exchange was founded in 2019 by leading financial institutions (FIs) — it aims to reduce the fixed costs of using market infrastructure platforms, as well as to streamline and simplify the trading process. It received Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) approval earlier this month and has earmarked the end of 2020 for its launch.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-05-13 07:00:00-05:00,"COVID-19 Is Rapidly Reshaping Consumer Banking and Payments Behaviors, New FIS Survey Finds","JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--The COVID-19 pandemic and government measures to slow its spread are altering the way Americans bank, pay and shop on an unprecedented scale and with rapid speed, according to a survey released today by financial services technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS). FIS surveyed more than 1,000 American consumers about the ways they are paying and banking amid social distancing and stay-at-home actions taken across the U.S. since the COVID-19 outbreak. The findings i",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-05-12 16:40:46-05:00,FIS Unveils Portal to Help SMEs Access PPP Loan Forgiveness,"There may be no second acts in politics. But with the Small Business Administration’s Paycheck Protection Program (PPP) rolling out the next phase in its loan forgiveness initiative for SMEs, it’s good to see that the economic rescue plan has another shot at getting it right. We chronicled some of the challenges that PPP 1.0 Read more… The post FIS Unveils Portal to Help SMEs Access PPP Loan Forgiveness appeared first on Finovate .",FIS,en,Finovate
2020-05-12 08:43:08-05:00,Dynamic reporting and data visualisation tools set to improve GP/LP relationship,"Dynamic reporting and data visualisation tools set to improve GP/LP relationship Submitted 12/05/2020 - 2:43pm The alternative fund management industry is witnessing a huge rise in the volume and diversity of data being ingested, as technology innovation facilitates firms in their research and portfolio construction activities; not to mention using advanced analytical tools to improve the quality of fund reporting. Investment and advisory firms have pioneered the use of data science in private equity, using the cloud to process large data sets and build a picture of what is happening in a given business, minute-by-minute, day-by-day. This is a golden age of data and analytics as asset managers start to increasingly use digitisation to find value in the marketplace. Fund administrators are well aware of the rapid pace of technology innovation and are themselves evolving in line with the complex nature of fund structures and allocations within those funds. “Coupled with the rapid pace of technology innovation, fund administration is using technology to approach the new complexities of fund structuring and investor types and needs,” says Joanne Baudin, Head of Fund Services, TMF Group (Australia). “Fund administration is no longer just about book keeping but helping fund managers and their investors, through technology, manage their investment portfolio, with visualisations and analysis, help manage documents, data mine and explore information with metrics etc.” As Private Equity Wire reported last year, the growth in data gathering by General Partners (GPs) on behalf of Limited Partners (LPs) is driven by the market developments and the regulatory focus on the space, leading more LPs to delegate the task of data management to their administrators.",FIS,en,PrivateEquityWire
2020-05-12 07:00:00-05:00,New FIS Portal Automates Loan Forgiveness Process for Small Businesses Under Paycheck Protection Program,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--With the second phase of the U.S. Small Business Administration’s Paycheck Protection Program (PPP) well underway as part of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act, thousands of small businesses and merchants across America will soon be turning their attention to seeking forgiveness of loans they have borrowed through the historic lending relief program. Financial services technology leader FIS ™ (NYSE: FIS) today announced a new port",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-05-11 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Cuts the Wait for New Credit and Debit Cardholders to Access Accounts,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) announced FIS Digital Issuance, a first-to-market solution that allows financial institutions to provide newly approved applicants with immediate mobile access to their credit and debit accounts. Avidia Bank is the first financial institution to begin offering the new FIS solution. Available to FIS credit or debit card processing clients, the solution allows consumers who are approved for a new credit or debit car",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-05-08 00:20:10-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services (NYSE: FIS) Q1 2020 Earnings Call Transcript | AlphaStreet,Final earnings conference call transcript of Fidelity National Information Services - FIS stock,FIS,en,news.alphastreet.com
2020-05-07 06:00:00-05:00,FIS Reports First Quarter 2020 Results,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE:FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today reported its first quarter 2020 results. First Quarter 2020 Results On a GAAP basis, revenue increased 50% to $3,078 million, primarily driven by the July 31, 2019 acquisition of Worldpay, Inc. (Worldpay). Net earnings attributable to common stockholders was $15 million or $0.02 per diluted share. On an adjusted basis, organic revenue growth increased 2% over the prior year period. Adju",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-05-07 05:26:00-05:00,Swiss authorities resort to use of spyware for the first time,"The annual report on Swiss surveillance operations in 2019 mentions the use of state-controlled monitoring software, known as GovWare, for the first time since it was authorised in 2018. The criminal prosecution authorities and the Federal Intelligence Service (FIS) reported the use of spyware for the first time with 12 such completed interventions before the end of 2019. Most of the cases concerned serious offences that could endanger life and cause bodily harm, as well as serious violations of the narcotics law. Since March 1, 2018, it has been possible to use such spyware and hidden antennas to eavesdrop on conversations or locate mobile phones (using IMSI-catchers). Investigators used hidden IMSI-catchers 103 times in 2019 compared to 84 in 2018. The majority of interventions were aimed at solving serious drug offences and urgent searches for missing persons. Overall, the number of surveillance warrants increased by a total of almost 15%, with a total of 8,666 operations …",FIS,en,Swiss Info
2020-05-05 15:14:17-05:00,Five Pillars Financial Institutions Should Leverage for Ethical Data Management,"As financial institutions weigh both the business benefits and potential consequences of having access to vast amounts of consumer data, FIs should leverage five pillars… The post Five Pillars Financial Institutions Should Leverage for Ethical Data Management appeared first on .",FIS,en,ValueWalk
2020-05-05 04:00:00-05:00,Worldpay from FIS Enables One-Click Google Pay Integration for Merchants,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today announced the addition of Google Pay to its Hosted Payment Page (HPP) product for online merchants. Because Worldpay from FIS has made the technical integration within their HPP offering, merchants can simply “turn on” Google Pay to enable express online checkouts. As consumers worldwide increasingly turn to shopping online during the COVID-19 pandemic, merchants who adopt digital paym",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-05-04 07:00:00-05:00,Winners of 2020 FIS Impact Awards Showcase Innovation While Giving Back to the Community,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today announced the winners of the 2020 FIS Impact Awards program. Independently judged by industry analyst group Celent, the Impact Awards recognize organizations that are using FIS technology in innovative ways to enhance customer experiences and drive tangible business results. The 2020 winners are: Bambu Systems, First United Bank & Trust, GE, IKB Deutsche Industriebank AG, KfW, USAb",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-05-01 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Offers Simplified Contracting and Pricing Model for Qualifying Community Banks and Credit Unions,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial services technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) today announced a simplified pricing and contracting model for qualifying U.S. community banks and credit unions that enables them to bring innovative new products and services to market more quickly, control expenses, and maximize the efficiency and resiliency of their operations – better positioning them for success as the economy recovers from the current health crisis. The new program adds to the comp",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-04-30 11:34:46-05:00,Analysts Estimate Fidelity National Information Services (FIS) to Report a Decline in Earnings: What to Look Out for,Fidelity National (FIS) doesn't possess the right combination of the two key ingredients for a likely earnings beat in its upcoming report. Get prepared with the key expectations.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2020-04-30 07:00:00-05:00,Bambu Taps Next-Generation FIS Platform to Bring Mobile-Only Banking Services to Unbanked Consumers,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, announced today that fintech startup Bambu has selected FIS’ next-generation Modern Banking Platform to power a new digital banking solution for U.S. unbanked and underbanked. Memphis-based neobank Bambu has created a financial mobile banking application to provide convenient and reliable services to underbanked Hispanic and other populations in the U.S. who lack access to bank accounts or o",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-04-28 12:08:59-05:00,FIS’ New Venture Arm Unveils Plan to Invest $150 Million in Fintechs,"Fintech giant FIS unveiled a new venture arm today. The Florida-based company is targeting a goal to invest $150 million in fintechs over the course of the next three years. The investment arm will focus on early-to-growth stage startups across the fintech sector and will centralize around emerging technologies such as AI and machine learning, Read more… The post FIS’ New Venture Arm Unveils Plan to Invest $150 Million in Fintechs appeared first on Finovate .",FIS,en,Finovate
2020-04-28 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Accelerates Innovation with $150 Million of New Capital for Venture Investments,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) announced today that FIS Ventures, the newly created corporate venture investment division of FIS, has launched an effort to invest a target of $150 million in promising fintech startups over the next three years. FIS Ventures will invest globally in early to growth-stage fintech startups with a focus on emerging technologies such as artificial intelligence and machine learning, digital enablement and automation,",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-04-27 18:15:00-05:00,Loan Servicing Software Market 2019-2023 | Need for Efficient Lending Operations to Boost Growth | Technavio,"Technavio has been monitoring the loan servicing software market and it is poised to grow by USD 446.54 million during 2019-2023, progressing at a CAGR of almost 12% during the forecast period. The report offers an up-to-date analysis regarding the current market scenario, latest trends and drivers, and the overall market environment. This press release features multimedia. View the full release here: https://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20200427005584/en/ Technavio has announced its latest market research report titled Global Loan Servicing Software Market 2019-2023 (Graphic: Business Wire) Technavio suggests three forecast scenarios (optimistic, probable, and pessimistic) considering the impact of COVID-19 . Please Request Latest Free Sample Report on COVID-19 Impact The market is moderately fragmented, and the degree of fragmentation will accelerate during the forecast period. Applied Business Software Inc., AutoPal Software LLC, Fidelity National Information Services Inc., Financial Industry Computer Systems Inc., Finastra, Fiserv Inc., Mortgage Builder, Nortridge Software LLC, Q2 Software Inc., and Shaw Systems Associates LLC. are some of the major market participants.","FIS,FISV",en,Benzinga Feeds
2020-04-27 11:47:18-05:00,"PayPal co-founder Max Levchin says brick-and-mortar will never be the same — here's how retail will be reinvented, and the 'software fight' that will go on behind the scenes","The acceleration of online shopping will change consumers' shopping habits, but that doesn't mean brick-and-mortar retail will go away completely. When the economy reopens consumers may not be eager to return to crowded places like malls. ""It's going to become a matter of survival to reinvent why they have physical retail,"" Max Levchin, founder and CEO of Affirm told Business Insider. Retailers will have to reimagine how they operate their stores as consumers expect the ability to shop from the comfort of their homes and conveniently pick up their purchases in-store. That requires an investment in software that equips smaller retailers with the same tech and infrastructure of players like Apple and Amazon. Click here for more BI Prime stories . Online shopping has accelerated amid the coronavirus pandemic, but that doesn't mean brick-and-mortar retail will go away completely. Consumers are unlikely to rush back to crowded places like malls to go shopping once stay-at-home orders start to lift. ""It's going to become a matter of survival to reinvent why they have physical retail,"" Max Levchin, co-founder of PayPal and CEO of Affirm told Business Insider. ""If customers are uncomfortable mingling by way of rubbing shoulders, what do you do about that?"" Levchin thinks that as the economy reopens, stores won't operate exactly the way they used to.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-04-23 11:32:50-05:00,FIS appoints new senior sales executive,FIS appoints former-regional manager of CloudMargin as senior sales executive,FIS,en,securitieslendingtimes.com
2020-04-23 09:48:00-05:00,"The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: PayPal, Fidelity National Information Services, Global Payments, Square and Intuit","The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: PayPal, Fidelity National Information Services, Global Payments, Square and Intuit",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2020-04-14 13:01:05-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services : FIS Enables States to Provide Online Grocery Shopping for SNAP Benefit Recipients | MarketScreener,"Key facts Through a pilot program, run by the U.S. Department of Agriculture , Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefit recipients can make online purchases of groceries through… | April 14, 2020",FIS,en,MarketScreener
2020-04-14 13:00:00-05:00,FIS Enables States to Provide Online Grocery Shopping for SNAP Benefit Recipients,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial services technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) announced today that it is assisting a number of U.S. states to enable online purchasing of food for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefit recipients under a pilot program run by the U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA). As a leading provider of Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) processing services for state-administered SNAP benefits, FIS has enabled Washington, Oregon and Nebraska to",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-04-14 11:57:13-05:00,FIS appoints new US senior sales executive,FIS has hired a former-EquiLend sales associate director for its US securities finance sales team,FIS,en,securitieslendingtimes.com
2020-04-13 15:05:00-05:00,FIS Updates First Quarter 2020 Financial Guidance Based on Impact of COVID-19,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE:FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today updates its first quarter 2020 financial guidance based on impacts of COVID-19. FIS has been carefully monitoring and assessing the effects of COVID-19 as conditions continue to evolve, and our thoughts are with the individuals and families who have been affected by the virus. The company has focused on the health and safety of its employees and local communities, and prioritized invest",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-04-03 06:00:00-05:00,FIS Partners with Banks and Credit Unions to Speed Relief to U.S. Small Businesses and Merchants Impacted by Coronavirus,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial services technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) announced today that it is enabling the ability for U.S. banks and credit unions to provide loans and other critical economic relief to small businesses and merchants under the U.S. Small Business Administration (SBA) Paycheck Protection Program within the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act enacted this week by the U.S. Department of Treasury. The Payroll Protection Program authori",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-03-18 02:58:00-05:00,Fidelity Continues to Grow Inorganically Despite High Costs,"Fidelity's (FIS) planned buyout of Worldpay will likely help it diversify revenues and expand presence in fast-growing markets. Yet, rising costs due to investment in technology are concerning.",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2020-03-16 02:55:46-05:00,Crores of rupees stolen from ATM; how safe is your money in banks?,"The misery of the Indian banking sector is not limited to the banks as even ATMs are not immune to incidents of theft and loot. Around Rs 54 crore has already been lost in ATMs, in-branch or in-transit phase for scheduled commercial banks and a few financial institutions (FIs) in the current fiscal year till […]",FIS,en,The Financial Express
2020-03-14 10:30:47-05:00,Fidelity National (FIS) Down 15.8% Since Last Earnings Report: Can It Rebound?,Fidelity National (FIS) reported earnings 30 days ago. What's next for the stock? We take a look at earnings estimates for some clues.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2020-03-06 08:30:00-05:00,Meet 5 startups backed by the likes of Andreessen Horowitz and Mark Cuban that are using automation to help consumers chip away at debt and start saving,"Rising credit card debt and student loans are a daily concern for many consumers and with outstanding debt, it can be hard for consumers to save. A wave of startups have cropped up offering their users automated ways to pay down debt and start saving. From rounding up transactions to the nearest dollar to putting away $0.50 cents a week, these startups are helping consumers start small with the backing of investors like Citi Ventures, Andreessen Horowitz, and Shark Tank's Mark Cuban. Click here for more BI Prime stories . For many, credit card debt and student loans are a daily concern. With millennials facing an affordability crisis and US credit card debt reaching record highs , many consumers struggle to balance day-to-day expenses, paying down debt, and saving. And budgeting down to the cent to find a few extra dollars here or there is time-consuming. Now, startups are stepping in offering consumers ways to pay down debt faster and start saving. Using automation, these apps link into users' bank accounts and loans to find opportunities to pay down debt or save.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-03-04 08:00:00-05:00,FIS Chief Risk Officer Greg Montana Co-Authors Incident Response Section of Newly Released Board Handbook on Cyber-Risk Oversight,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) announced today that its Chief Risk Officer Greg Montana has co-authored the Incident Response section of the 7th edition of the “Director’s Handbook on Cyber-Risk Oversight,” released last week by the Internet Security Alliance (ISA) and the National Association of Corporate Directors (NACD). The guidebook, available on four continents and in five languages, provides comprehensive guidance and tools to help boards enhance",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-02-28 09:48:00-05:00,Lendio plans to use $55 million in fresh funding to expand its bookkeeping platform,"This story was delivered to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Pro subscribers earlier this morning. To get this story plus others to your inbox each day, hours before they're published on Business Insider, click here. The funding round for the US fintech, which operates a marketplace for small business loans, included $31 million in equity led by Mercato Partners' Traverse Fund and a $24 million debt facility from Signature Bank, per a press release seen by Business Insider Intelligence. Lendio also operates a separate bookkeeping platform called Sunrise and has a lender service division. The oversubscribed equity round included participation from Napier Park Financial Partners, Comcast Ventures, and Blumberg Capital. Since being founded in 2011, Lendio has facilitated over 100,000 loans totaling over $2 billion. Small businesses using Lendio's platform have to complete an online application that typically takes 15 minutes and is processed by the fintech's machine learning algorithms, which match the applicant with a range of suitable lenders.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-02-26 15:54:16-05:00,Alpine Skiing: World Cup Finals to be held without fans due to coronavirus,"STOCKHOLM: The alpine skiing World Cup Finals scheduled for next month in Italy will take place without any fans on the slopes due to the coronavirus outbreak, an International Ski Federation (FIS) official told Swedish television on Wednesday (Feb 26). The event will be held between Mar 18-22 in …",FIS,en,Channel NewsAsia
2020-02-25 06:33:01-05:00,FIS continues European securities finance sales hires,"So far this year, FIS has welcomed a new sales team members from EquiLend and IHS Markit to promote its securities finance and collateral management services across Europe",FIS,en,securitieslendingtimes.com
2020-02-25 06:09:11-05:00,FIS continues European sales hires,"So far this year, FIS has welcomed new sales team members from Broadridge, EquiLend and IHS Markit to promote its securities finance and collateral management services across Europe",FIS,en,securitieslendingtimes.com
2020-02-19 08:00:00-05:00,"FIS, Clients Awarded for Innovative Treasury and Cash Management Solutions","JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) and its clients have earned a total of six awards from two prestigious award programs for their quality and innovative treasury and cash management solutions. In Global Finance’s ranking of the World’s Best Treasury and Cash Management Banks and Providers, FIS was recognized for Best Treasury Management Software and Best Cross-Border Payments Solution for Corporates. FIS was also recognized in the 2019 Treasury Ma",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-02-18 08:56:00-05:00,Opel Bank in Germany Becomes First European Bank to Choose FIS Modern Banking Platform | Fintech Finance,"FIS announced today that Opel Bank in Germany has chosen its next-generation core banking system, FIS Modern Banking Platform, to power its online bank.",FIS,en,Fintech Finance
2020-02-18 08:35:00-05:00,Germany's Opel becomes first EU bank to implement FIS Modern Banking Platform,"FIS(NYSE: FIS) announced today that Opel Bank in Germany has chosen its next-generation core banking system, FIS Modern Banking Platform, to power its o…",FIS,en,Finextra Research
2020-02-18 08:00:00-05:00,Opel Bank in Germany Becomes First European Bank to Choose FIS Modern Banking Platform,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla,--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) announced today that Opel Bank in Germany has chosen its next-generation core banking system, FIS Modern Banking Platform, to power its online bank. Opel Bank is the first European-based bank to choose the new platform since its introduction in January. Opel Bank serves more than 40,000 deposit customers primarily through online channels without the need to maintain an expensive branch network. The bank was looking to replace its legacy core",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-02-17 00:30:55-05:00,FIS touts client growth and loyalty partnership with PayPal,"The modernization of core banking tools and loyalty point redemption mechanisms are key priorities for banking technology provider FIS. In a fourth-quarter earnings call last week, the Jacksonville, Fla.-based company reported continued growth of its next-generation banking platforms, along with its new agreement with PayPal allowing consumers of client institutions that participate in FIS’ Premium […]",FIS,en,Bank Innovation
2020-02-13 12:33:02-05:00,"Fidelity National Up Over 5%, on Pace for Record High -- Data Talk | MarketScreener","Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. is currently at $155.73, up $7.77 or 5.25% -- Would be new all-time high -- On pace for largest percent increase since May 3, 2016, when it… | February 13, 2020",FIS,en,MarketScreener
2020-02-13 08:25:06-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services (FIS) Beats Q4 Earnings and Revenue Estimates,"Fidelity National (FIS) delivered earnings and revenue surprises of 1.95% and 0.24%, respectively, for the quarter ended December 2019. Do the numbers hold clues to what lies ahead for the stock?",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2020-02-13 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Reports Fourth Quarter and Full-Year 2019 Results,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE:FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today reported its fourth quarter and full-year 2019 results. “2019 was a transformative year for FIS,” said Gary Norcross, FIS chairman, president and chief executive officer. “We closed the largest fintech acquisition of the year and exited 2019 well ahead of our Worldpay integration synergy schedule. Our record-setting new sales performance was underpinned by our ongoing investment in next",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-02-13 06:24:00-05:00,FIS to enable pay with rewards at PayPal merchant sites,FIS (NYSE: FIS) and PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) are extending their partnership to enable millions of cardholders of U.S. financial institutions to participat…,FIS,en,Finextra Research
2020-02-13 04:27:41-05:00,"Earnings Scheduled For February 13, 2020","Companies Reporting Before The Bell The Kraft Heinz Company (NASDAQ: KHC ) is estimated to report quarterly earnings at $0.68 per share on revenue of $6.61 billion. PepsiCo, Inc. (NASDAQ: PEP ) is expected to report quarterly earnings at $1.44 per share on revenue of $20.27 billion. Waste Management, Inc. (NYSE: WM ) is projected to report quarterly earnings at $1.15 per share on revenue of $3.97 billion. Huntington Ingalls Industries, Inc. (NYSE: HII ) is expected to report quarterly earnings at $4.20 per share on revenue of $2.32 billion. Alibaba Group Holding Limited (NYSE: BABA ) is projected to report quarterly earnings at $2.22 per share on revenue of $22.45 billion. American International Group, Inc. (NYSE: AIG ) is estimated to report quarterly earnings at $1.00 per share on revenue of $11.90 billion. Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (NYSE: FIS ) is projected to report quarterly earnings at $1.53 per share on revenue of $3.33 billion. Zoetis Inc. (NYSE: ZTS ) is expected to report quarterly earnings at $0.88 per share on revenue of $1.00 billion.",FIS,en,Benzinga Feeds
2020-02-12 14:00:00-05:00,FIS Extends Partnership with PayPal to Enable U.S. Cardholders to Redeem Loyalty Points for Purchases,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) and PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) are extending their partnership to enable millions of cardholders of U.S. financial institutions to participate in PayPal’s Pay with Rewards. Beginning in Q3 2020, cardholders of thousands of financial institutions participating in FIS’ Premium Payback loyalty network will be able to use their eligible card loyalty points to pay for eligible online purchases at millions of PayPal merchants globally. Cardholders in F",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-02-12 10:41:00-05:00,Swiss spy scandal documents to remain under lock and key,"Many of the documents relating to the Crypto company spy scandal will remain under lock and key, says the deputy head of the Swiss Federal Intelligence Service (FIS). Even the intelligence services don’t know what happened to a file that went missing in 2014, according to a Swiss public television SRF report. It is alleged that the German and United States intelligence services spied on a host of other countries after they took over the Crypto business in 1971. Hundreds of thousands of messages between governments, embassies and military commands from more than 100 countries could be monitored up until 2018 when the espionage is said to have stopped. The revelation, uncovered by a media investigation, has rocked Switzerland’s image as a neutral nation. The Swiss government has appointed a former judge to conduct an inquiry into the case. The investigation by SRF, the Washington Post and German broadcaster ZDF, relied on 280 pages of previously secret documents. But Jürg Buhler …",FIS,en,Swiss Info
2020-02-12 09:04:17-05:00,What to Expect From Fidelity National's (FIS) Q4 Earnings?,Fidelity's (FIS) Q4 results are anticipated to reflect year-over-year improvement in revenues and a decline in earnings.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2020-02-06 12:31:09-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services (FIS) Expected to Beat Earnings Estimates: Can the Stock Move Higher?,Fidelity National (FIS) possesses the right combination of the two key ingredients for a likely earnings beat in its upcoming report. Get prepared with the key expectations.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2020-02-06 11:07:34-05:00,Fiserv's acquisition of First Data has paid off in a big way,"This story was delivered to Business Insider Intelligence Payments & Commerce subscribers earlier this morning. To get this story plus others to your inbox each day, hours before they're published on Business Insider, click here . Fiserv recorded almost $3.7 billion in internal revenue in Q4 2019, growing 5% year-over-year (YoY), per the company's earnings release . First Data, which Fiserv acquired for $22 billion in a deal that closed in July 2019, contributed 61% of the total company's internal revenue in the quarter — worth over $2.2 billion — and grew 6% YoY. With First Data driving both Fiserv's revenue and growth in Q4 2019, it's set up to be a core part of the business for years to come. Fiserv appears set to find new short- and long-term revenue opportunities thanks to the acquisition. The company believes it's on track to bring in at least $100 million in revenue synergies in 2020, Frank Bisignano, Fiserv COO and former First Data CEO, said on the company's earnings call . Being able to combine First Data's offerings, like Clover — which increased its annualized gross payment volume (GPV) by over 40% YoY, according to Fiserv CEO Jeff Yabuki — as well as both firms' processing capabilities and existing relationships should enable Fiserv to attract new clients and cross-sell to existing ones.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2020-02-05 09:16:00-05:00,Goldman and Amazon's lending partnership presents a huge threat to fintechs,"This story was delivered to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Pro subscribers earlier this morning. To get this story plus others to your inbox each day, hours before they're published on Business Insider, click here. The US banking giant is in advanced talks with Amazon to offer small business loans through Amazon's lending platform, per the Financial Times citing two people briefed on the discussions. Goldman, which has bet big on broadening its trading and investment banking business via a move into retail banking, has already started building technology to facilitate the lending. The proposed project could launch as soon as March, according to the individuals cited by the FT. The news signals that Goldman is continuing its push to become an ally to big techs looking to broaden their financial services footprint. Goldman's potential tie-up with Amazon comes less than a year after it tied up with Apple to launch Apple Card. Apple Card marked the tech company's first proprietary card product, and Goldman was responsible for issuing it.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-02-04 10:57:00-05:00,Worldline is buying solutions provider Ingenico for $8.6 billion,"This story was delivered to Business Insider Intelligence Payments & Commerce subscribers earlier this morning. To get this story plus others to your inbox each day, hours before they're published on Business Insider, click here. Worldline, a processor and payments solution provider, announced plans to acquire Ingenico, a fellow solutions provider that is well-established in the point-of-sale (POS) technology industry. The transaction will be a cash and share deal that values Ingenico at €7.8 billion ($8.6 billion), per TechCrunch . The move lends credence to the idea that Worldline is interested in building up its business and capabilities through acquisition, considering it also announced plans to buy the payments segment of payment service provider SIX for €2.3 billion ($2.73 billion) in May 2018. The transaction between Worldline and Ingenico, which are both based in France, is expected to close during Q3 2020. The announcement claimed the combination will create the number four player in payments services globally, as bringing in Ingenico should enable Worldline to add revenue opportunities and consolidate its business.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-01-30 09:00:00-05:00,One third of Swiss companies are spied on,"With its research institutes, international organizations and highly specialised firms, Switzerland is attractive to spies. For the first time a study shows the extent of this industrial espionage. A typical example: Someone uses social networks to connect with an employee at a Swiss company and get insight into production methods. Later, similar but much cheaper products appear on the market, causing the Swiss company’s sales to plummet, threatening its very existence. Cases like this are on the rise. Industrial espionage has increased greatly in recent years, but there weren’t any reliable figures for Switzerland until now. Companies often don’t notice that they’ve been spied on. Or they refrain from reporting it to the authorities for fear of losing their reputation. One in three In order to improve prevention, the Federal Intelligence Service (FIS) has commissioned the Institute for Criminal Law and Criminology at the University of Bern to investigate the extent of …",FIS,en,Swiss Info
2020-01-28 07:43:00-05:00,"The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: S&P Global, FleetCor Technologies, Global Payments, Waste Management and Fidelity National Information Services","The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: S&P Global, FleetCor Technologies, Global Payments, Waste Management and Fidelity National Information Services",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2020-01-24 09:51:04-05:00,FIS Announces Payment Processing Expansion in Africa,"Click HERE to find out ⭐ FIS Announces Payment Processing Expansion in Africa. | Crowdfund Insider: Global Fintech News, including Crowdfunding, Blockchain and more.",FIS,en,Crowdfund Insider
2020-01-24 09:12:00-05:00,Brex is looking to expand its product suite beyond cards and cash accounts,"This story was delivered to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Pro subscribers earlier this morning. To get this story plus others to your inbox each day, hours before they're published on Business Insider, click here. US-based Brex, the $2.6 billion-valued corporate credit card startup, is planning to broaden its product suite beyond its core banking services, reports Bank Innovation. The startup's newly appointed COO Paul-Henri Ferrand told the outlet that the three-year-old company aims to bolster its existing service with the introduction of insurance, lending, and treasury products, though he didn't specify when. Brex, which launched publicly in June 2018, offers corporate credit cards to startups, a segment that's long been underserved by incumbent lenders. It expanded into banking in October 2019, with a limited rollout of a cash management account; Ferrand says Brex plans to roll out the product widely by the end of March 2020. Bolstering its product suite can help Brex deepen its relationship with its clients and reap more revenue from its user base.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-01-23 14:46:00-05:00,"Why are Apple Pay, Starbucks' app, and Samsung Pay so much more successful than other mobile wallet providers?","This is a preview of The Payments Ecosystem research report from Business Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. Business Insider Intelligence offers even more consumer coverage with Payments & Commerce Pro. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing payments and commerce news and analysis to your inbox. In the US, the in-store mobile wallet space is becoming increasingly crowded. Most customers have an option provided by their smartphone vendor, like Apple, Android, or Samsung Pay. But those are often supplemented by a myriad of options from other players, ranging from tech firms like PayPal, to banks and card issuers, to major retailers and restaurants. With that proliferation of options, one would expect to see a surge in adoption. But that's not the case — though Business Insider Intelligence projects that US in-store mobile payments volume will quintuple in the next five years, usage is consistently lagging below expectations, with estimates for 2019 falling far below what we expected just two years ago.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2020-01-23 07:54:42-05:00,FIS shuffles senior management and brings in new talent,"Andrew Murray takes the reins of FIS’ European sales for post-trade solutions, while Lee Bernini joins from IHS Markit as a senior sales executive",FIS,en,securitieslendingtimes.com
2020-01-22 08:00:00-05:00,FIS Commits to Cincinnati as a Strategic Technology and Innovation Campus,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial services technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) and the State of Ohio announced today that the company plans to solidify its presence in Cincinnati as a Strategic Technology and Innovation Campus. The campus in Governor’s Hill, in Symmes Township, Ohio, previously served as the corporate headquarters of Worldpay, which was acquired by FIS on July 31, 2019. “Our significant presence in the Cincinnati market and the state of Ohio is integral to our long-",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-01-21 14:52:46-05:00,FIS Opens Applications For 2020 Fintech Accelerator Program,"Click HERE to find out ⭐ FIS Opens Applications For 2020 Fintech Accelerator Program. | Crowdfund Insider: Global Fintech News, including Crowdfunding, Blockchain and more.",FIS,en,Crowdfund Insider
2020-01-21 08:00:00-05:00,Applications Open for 2020 FIS Fintech Accelerator,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, announced today that applications are open for the 2020 FIS Fintech Accelerator. Applications can be completed through March 6 at www.venturecenter.co/fisfintech. Now in its fifth year, the FIS Fintech Accelerator program, conducted in collaboration with the State of Arkansas and Little Rock-based The Venture Center, is designed to identify and help startup firms accelerate the development o",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-01-16 04:35:00-05:00,Union Bank© Partners with FIS for Next Generation Banking Technology | Fintech Finance,Union Bank and global technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) today announced a cooperative agreement to deliver a next-generation core banking platform to power the…,FIS,en,Fintech Finance
2020-01-15 11:10:00-05:00,Union Bank signs with FIS for core banking overhaul,Union Bank and global technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) today announced a cooperative agreement to deliver a next-generation core banking platform to p…,FIS,en,Finextra Research
2020-01-15 08:00:00-05:00,Union Bank© Partners with FIS for Next Generation Banking Technology,"LOS ANGELES, Jan. 15, 2020 /PRNewswire/ -- Union Bank and global technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) today announced a cooperative agreement to deliver a next-generation core banking platform to power the bank through its next iteration of digital offerings. Union Bank, a member of MUFG…",FIS,en,PR Newswire
2020-01-13 09:00:00-05:00,First Republic Bank Puts Clients First in Move to FIS Core Banking Platform,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) announced today that First Republic Bank, a leading provider of private banking, private business banking and wealth management services, has selected the FIS IBS platform as part of a core banking modernization program. First Republic Bank has over $110 billion in banking assets, $140 billion of wealth management assets, and is a member of the S&P 500 Index. The bank has enjoyed strong, organic growth since i",FIS,en,Business Wire
2020-01-09 05:44:03-05:00,FIS acquires large stake in Virtus Partners,"FIS has officially closed the acquisition of a majority interest in Virtus Partners, which will enable it to connect the full lending value chain across the buy and sell sides",FIS,en,securitieslendingtimes.com
2020-01-08 00:01:18-05:00,Startup HTMA taps FIS to equip banks and credit unions with digital tools,"While third-party personal finance apps have garnered attention through direct-to-consumer offerings, HT Mobile Apps is looking to reach more users by offering savings and financial literacy tools to partner institutions. The eight-year-old company is working with banking technology giant FIS to reach new financial institutions. Through the FIS partnership, HTMA, which currently partners with 41 […]",FIS,en,Bank Innovation
2020-01-07 13:39:00-05:00,"Here is a list of the top payment gateway provider companies in 2020 (PYPL, AMZN, WPG, VNTV)","This is a preview of The Payments Gateways research report from Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. Insider Intelligence offers even more consumer coverage with Payments & Commerce Pro. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing payments and commerce news and analysis to your inbox. Payment gateways are the first step in the online payment process, and they have been crucial in helping e-commerce companies more easily accept online transactions. These gateways serve as the online version of a payment terminal and front-end processor for online and mobile sellers. They often sell bundled services that include payment acceptance, data reporting, and fraud management. Business Insider Intelligence expects that as global retail e-commerce volume continues to rise, revenue the companies processing these payments can collect as fees will increase from $82 billion in 2018 to $138 billion in 2024. Furthermore, merchants and consumers are both shifting to digital, which is giving gateways more influence.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2020-01-03 08:20:00-05:00,"The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: Pfizer, BP, Fidelity National Information Services, Deere & Company and Equity Residential","The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: Pfizer, BP, Fidelity National Information Services, Deere & Company and Equity Residential",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-12-29 05:19:00-05:00,Swiss issue more entry bans for potential criminals,"Since January, the Swiss authorities have issued 118 entry bans - more than ever before. Those affected include radical Islamists, neo-Nazis, Mafia members and spies. The Federal Office of Police (Fedpol) can impose entry bans on dangerous foreigners who endanger Switzerland's internal or external security. Fedpol consults with the Federal Intelligence Service (FIS) in this regard. As in previous years, most of the entry bans (62 out of 118) concerned radical Islamists, according to newspaper SonntagsBlick. However, Fedpol does not elaborate on the reasons they were not allowed to enter the country. It is likely that those affected had joined terrorist organisations such as the Islamic State or were known to be hate preachers. No entry ban can be issued against radical Islamists holding a Swiss passport though. Of the 92 jihadists who left Switzerland for Syria or other conflict zones 31 hold a Swiss passport. In extreme cases, the citizenship of a Swiss terrorist abroad can …",FIS,en,Swiss Info
2019-12-28 13:22:13-05:00,Perfect start! Russia’s Sergey Ustiugov wins first stage of FIS Tour de Ski,Russian cross-country skier Sergey Ustiugov got off to a perfect start at the prestigious International Ski Federation (FIS) World Cup event – Tour de Ski – confidently winning the first stage of the seven-tour event on Saturday. Read Full Article at RT.com,FIS,en,Russia Today
2019-12-20 05:35:00-05:00,Worldpay enters Japan with JCB,"FIS (NYSE: FIS) today announced an agreement with JCB, the leading issuer and acquirer in Japan and a global payment network.",FIS,en,Finextra Research
2019-12-19 16:20:00-05:00,Worldpay From FIS Opens New Doors for JCB Card Acceptance in Japan,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) today announced an agreement with JCB, the leading issuer and acquirer in Japan and a global payment network. Worldpay, FIS’ global eCommerce platform, will allow businesses operating in Japan to accept payments by JCB cards. With this agreement, Worldpay now provides a comprehensive eCommerce solution for enterprise merchants operating in Japan. Worldpay merchants selling online in Japan will now be able to streamline their payments technol",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-12-18 14:27:00-05:00,"A list of the biggest credit card merchants and payment processing companies in 2020 (JPM, BAC, C, WFC, VNTV, TSS, BCS, FDC, WPG)","This is a preview of The Payments Ecosystem research report from Business Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. Business Insider Intelligence offers even more consumer coverage with Payments & Commerce Pro. Subscribe today to receive industry-changing payments and commerce news and analysis to your inbox. Credit card processors are mostly responsible for data transmission and security when you use your card at a store or online to make a purchase. There are two types of processors in the payment-card system. Front-end processors route transactions from merchants to the cardholder's bank to gain authorization; that is, they make sure a customer has enough available credit or funds to make a purchase. Back-end processors are responsible for a fund's settlement, which ends with the merchant receiving a deposit for transactions. Below, we've outlined the major players in credit card processing and described their major strengths. Bank of America Bank of America Merchant Services has the advantage of functioning within the second-largest bank in the U.S.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2019-12-17 11:50:22-05:00,Morgan Stanley sees threats to legacy core providers’ business models,"Core banking providers FIS and Fiserv face pressure from banks’ growing in-house tech investments as well as fintech competition, Morgan Stanley reported in a research note this week. The study argued that FIS and Fiserv continue to be good businesses, with FIS historically serving clients with more than $1 billion in assets and Fiserv catering […]",FIS,en,Bank Innovation
2019-12-17 08:00:00-05:00,VyStar Credit Union Moves to FIS for Card Processing as Part of Growth Push,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--In a major expansion of their work together, VyStar Credit Union—which is headquartered in Jacksonville, Florida and is one of the country’s largest credit unions—will be moving its credit card production and processing services to FIS™ (NYSE: FIS), the financial technology solutions leader announced today. In 2018, VyStar, which serves over 690,000 members, started planning their move to a new, modern front end for their core banking solution from FIS to su",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-12-05 21:08:00-05:00,FIS Announces the Early Tender Results and Increase of Its Pending Maximum Tender Offer,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Fidelity National Information Services, FIS™, (NYSE:FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, announced today the early tender results of its previously announced cash tender offer (the “Maximum Tender Offer”). FIS also announced that it has increased the Maximum Tender Offer amount from up to an aggregate maximum repurchase amount of $650,000,000 principal amount to $811,972,000 principal amount (such increased principal amount, the “Aggregate",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-12-05 11:31:03-05:00,Fidelity National (FIS) Up 3.7% Since Last Earnings Report: Can It Continue?,Fidelity National (FIS) reported earnings 30 days ago. What's next for the stock? We take a look at earnings estimates for some clues.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-12-03 08:00:00-05:00,First Horizon Bank Deepens Relationships with FIS Customer Loyalty Solution,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, announced today that First Horizon Bank has selected the FIS Relationship Rewards solution to create a leading-edge customer loyalty program for its 1.5 million consumer accounts. Formerly First Tennessee Bank and Capital Bank, First Horizon Bank is a leading financial institution in the Southeast with 300 branch locations and more than $40 billion in assets. As part of a strategic growth pu",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-12-02 19:47:00-05:00,FIS Announces Expiration and Results of Any and All Tender Offer,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Fidelity National Information Services, FIS™, (NYSE:FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, announced today that its previously announced cash tender offer (the “Any and All Tender Offer”) for any and all of its outstanding 3.625% Senior Notes due 2020 (the “2020 Notes”), 2.250% Senior Notes due 2021 (the “2021 Notes”) and 4.500% Senior Notes due 2022 (the “2022 Notes” and, collectively with the 2020 Notes and the 2021 Notes, the “Any and All",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-12-02 16:13:00-05:00,FIS Announces the Pricing Terms of its Pending Any and All Tender Offer,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Fidelity National Information Services, FIS™, (NYSE:FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, announced today the pricing terms of its previously announced cash tender offer (the “Any and All Tender Offer”) for any and all of its outstanding 3.625% Senior Notes due 2020, its outstanding 2.250% Senior Notes due 2021 and its outstanding 4.500% Senior Notes due 2022 (collectively, the “Any and All Notes”). The terms and conditions of the Any and A",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-11-27 13:04:45-05:00,FIS Integrates with IBM to Help Clients Counter Fraud,"Financial services vendor FIS has announced that it has integrated IBM’s Safer Payments solution within its peer-to-peer (P2P) services to aid in the prevention of fraud, reports Alex Hamilton of Fintech Futures, Finovate’ sister publication. With the IBM solution integrated, FIS believes its P2P services will be able to monitor high volumes of transactions and Read more… The post FIS Integrates with IBM to Help Clients Counter Fraud appeared first on Finovate .",FIS,en,Finovate
2019-11-26 06:14:00-05:00,FIS adds IBM fraud detection to P2P payments service,Financial services technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) announced today that it has integrated the IBM Safer Payments solution with its P2P (person-to-per…,FIS,en,Finextra Research
2019-11-25 08:00:00-05:00,FIS Integrates IBM Fraud Detection Solution to Help Clients Tackle Person-to-Person Payments Fraud in the U.S.,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Financial services technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) announced today that it has integrated the IBM Safer Payments solution with its P2P (person-to-person) services to better help U.S. financial institutions prevent fraud on real-time P2P payment services. As consumer usage of real-time P2P services continues to grow at a rapid rate, banks and other financial institutions need advanced ways to identify and prevent fraudulent transactions on even small-dolla",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-11-24 08:41:00-05:00,Alpine skiing: FIS president Kasper to step down after 22 years,https://www.investing.com/news/general/alpine-skiing-fis-president-kasper-to-step-down-after-22-years-2026886,FIS,en,Investing.com
2019-11-21 19:13:03-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services : FIS Announces Pricing of Senior Notes Offering | MarketScreener,"Fidelity National Information Services, FIS™, a global leader in financial services technology, today announced the pricing of its multi-tranche offering of senior notes denominated in Euro… | November 22, 2019",FIS,en,MarketScreener
2019-11-21 08:00:00-05:00,Victory Capital Expands Transfer Agency Services with FIS,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Victory Capital has selected a leading-edge transfer agent solution from FIS™ (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, to service new accounts related to a recently completed acquisition. Under a significant contract expansion with this long-term client, FIS will provide Victory Capital with a modern, 24/7, real-time mutual fund processing and recordkeeping platform delivered through a business process-as-a-service model to service its",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-11-21 03:41:00-05:00,FIS Announces Cash Tender Offers for Certain Outstanding Senior Notes,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Fidelity National Information Services, FIS™, (NYSE:FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today announced that it has commenced tender offers (each individually, with respect to a series of notes, a “Tender Offer” with respect to such series, and collectively, the “Tender Offers”) to purchase for cash (1) any and all of its outstanding 3.625% Senior Notes due 2020, its outstanding 2.250% Senior Notes due 2021 and its outstanding 4.500% Seni",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-11-20 11:00:00-05:00,FIS Teams with Eyefinity to Advance Payments for U.S. Eye Care Practices,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™(NYSE: FIS) and Eyefinity, a VSP Global company, today announced an agreement to offer leading-edge new payment solutions to eye care practices across the United States. Eyefinity will integrate the Worldpay from FIS1 payment processing platform into its network of Eyefinity Practice Management, OfficeMate®, and AcuityLogic™ optometric practices, which provide eye care services across the nation. By working together, FIS and Eyefinity look to deliver a m",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-11-19 12:33:00-05:00,Hedge Funds Bail on T-Mobile US and Uber Technologies Stock,The favorite new buys of hedge funds in the third quarter are topped by a pair of financial technology and services firms: Fiserv and Fidelity National Information Services.,"FIS,FISV",en,Barron's
2019-11-18 09:07:00-05:00,Winter4Kids Partners With U.S. Ski & Snowboard And The International Federation of Skiing (FIS) To Host First NorAm Parallel Slalom Event In The U.S.,"VERNON, N.J., Nov. 18, 2019 /PRNewswire/ -- Winter4Kids at the National Winter Activity Center, the nation's first and only fully dedicated youth winter sports facility, announced today a partnership with U.S. Ski & Snowboard and the International Federation of Skiing (FIS) to host the…",FIS,en,PR Newswire
2019-11-17 05:06:27-05:00,"Lenore D. Williams Sells 7,301 Shares of Fidelity National Information Servcs Inc (NYSE:FIS) Stock","Fidelity National Information Servcs Inc (NYSE:FIS) EVP Lenore D. Williams sold 7,301 shares of Fidelity National Information Servcs stock in a transaction that occurred on Thursday, November 14th. The stock was sold at an average price of $135.00, for a total value of $985,635.00. Following the transaction, the executive vice president now directly owns 5,400 […]",FIS,en,Modern Readers
2019-11-07 08:00:00-05:00,Apple Bank Looks to the Future With Hosted Core Banking Platform from FIS,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, announced today that Apple Bank is moving to a hosted modern core banking platform from FIS as part of a major core transformation program to support its continued growth. With 79 branches and assets of more than $15 billion, Apple Bank is the second-largest state-chartered savings bank in New York State. Throughout its more than 150-year history, the bank has prided itself on providing high",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-11-06 08:00:00-05:00,FIS Earns Top Spot in Chartis RiskTech100® for Fifth Consecutive Year,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--For the fifth consecutive year, financial technology leader FIS™ (NYSE: FIS) has received the number one ranking in the Chartis RiskTech100®. Compiled by leading industry research group Chartis Research, the RiskTech100® ranks the world’s top 100 providers of risk management and compliance technology solutions. In addition to receiving the top spot in the 2020 rankings, FIS ranked first in the categories of Market Presence, Functionality, Insurance, IFRS 17,",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-11-05 12:00:25-05:00,"Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (FIS) Q3 2019 Earnings Call Transcript | The Motley Fool","FIS earnings call for the period ending September 30, 2019.",FIS,en,The Motley Fool
2019-11-05 09:15:40-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services : Q3 2019 Earnings Supplemental Data | MarketScreener,"THIRD QUARTER 2019 EARNINGS CALL November 5, 2019 AGENDA Gary Norcross, Business… | November 5, 2019",FIS,en,MarketScreener
2019-11-05 08:25:07-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services (FIS) Q3 Earnings and Revenues Surpass Estimates,"Fidelity National (FIS) delivered earnings and revenue surprises of 5.93% and 0.76%, respectively, for the quarter ended September 2019. Do the numbers hold clues to what lies ahead for the stock?",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-11-05 08:06:04-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services : FIS Reports Third Quarter 2019 Results | MarketScreener,"Nov. 5, 2019-- FIS™ , a global leader in financial services technology, today reported its third quarter 2019 results. 'FIS' results this quarter exceeded our expectations;… | November 5, 2019",FIS,en,MarketScreener
2019-11-05 07:00:00-05:00,FIS Reports Third Quarter 2019 Results,"JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE:FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, today reported its third quarter 2019 results. “FIS’ results this quarter exceeded our expectations; demonstrating strong growth across the entire enterprise,” said Gary Norcross, FIS chairman, president and chief executive officer. “We are pleased by the robust demand for our new merchant offerings and are making early progress against our synergy targets and overall integration of Worldpay.",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-11-04 03:33:00-05:00,What's in the Store for Fidelity National's (FIS) Q3 Earnings?,Fidelity's (FIS) Q3 results anticipated to reflect year-over-year improvements in both earnings and revenues.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-11-01 12:08:00-05:00,"FIS to Build New World Headquarters in Jacksonville, Florida","JACKSONVILLE, Fla.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--FIS™ (NYSE: FIS), a global leader in financial services technology, announced today that it has received city and state approvals on an economic development package for plans to build a new, expanded world headquarters in Jacksonville, Florida to support the company’s continued growth. FIS has also entered into a real estate purchase agreement with Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Florida, Inc. (Florida Blue) to purchase the riverfront property located at 323 R",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-10-30 06:04:04-05:00,AxiomSL partners with Genpact to deliver model management service,"AxiomSL, a provider of regulatory reporting and risk management solutions, is partnering with Genpact, a global professional services firm focused on delivering digital transformation, to empower financial firms (FIs) to efficiently implement IntegratedModelView, a model management framework, on the AxiomSL platform.",FIS,en,institutionalassetmanager.co.uk
2019-10-30 04:00:00-05:00,AxiomSL Partners with Genpact to Deliver IntegratedModelView ― An Innovative Framework for Model Management,"NEW YORK & LONDON--(BUSINESS WIRE)-- #BaselIV--AxiomSL, the industry’s leading provider of regulatory reporting and risk management solutions, today announces an agreement with Genpact, a global professional services firm focused on delivering digital transformation, to empower financial firms (FIs) to efficiently implement IntegratedModelView on the AxiomSL platform. AxiomSL’s IntegratedModelView offers FIs a fresh approach to model management by enabling them to create, manage, maintain, and execute ope",FIS,en,Business Wire
2019-09-22 19:22:22-05:00,"Emerging markets, M&A, and new services: here are they key trends to watch in the fast-changing payments space","Emerging markets, led by Latin America, powered 6% growth in global payments revenue last year, according to a brand new report from McKinsey. Additional M&A is expected as companies buy their way to more product offerings, capabilities and scale, with deals like PayPal's 2018 acquisition of iZettle. Payments-as-a-service can open up new ways to rake in revenue, like Square adding payroll services and lending. Banks need to embrace the changes that their customers want, the report said. Click here for more BI Prime stories The payments industry has seen revenue steadily growing and new entrants muscling into more areas of the space. That has banks and other long-time players rethinking their approach and scrambling to keep up. And more change is expected as cash and paper checks increasingly become replaced by digital payments around the world. Consulting firm McKinsey & Company published its 2019 Global Payments Map report on Monday at the Sibos conference in London. In this year's report, McKinsey explored those disruptive trends and forecast shifts to come in the payments ecosystem.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-09-05 08:31:26-05:00,Why Is Fidelity National (FIS) Up 2.4% Since Last Earnings Report?,Fidelity National (FIS) reported earnings 30 days ago. What's next for the stock? We take a look at earnings estimates for some clues.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-08-22 10:58:00-05:00,FINTECH AND FINANCIAL INCLUSION: How low-overhead direct banking models enable banks to profitably serve the US’ 33 million underbanked households,"This is a preview of the Fintech and Financial Inclusion research report from Business Insider Intelligence. Purchase this report. 14-Day Risk Free Trial: Get full access to this and all Fintech industry research reports. Historically, the US banking industry has discussed financial inclusion solely in terms of corporate social responsibility (CSR). Offering services to the underserved — unbanked consumers who lack access to banking products, and underbanked consumers who make only limited use of mainstream financial services — has long been economically unviable. But two forces have flipped the conversation from CSR to a genuine business opportunity. First, digital tools from mobile banking to AI are driving down costs and allowing financial institutions (FIs) to offer previously untenable products, such as fee-free accounts or credit scoring based on unconventional data. Second, the US' financial landscape is more competitive than ever, as fintechs, incumbents, and even tech companies like Amazon vie for larger shares of the overall space.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-08-08 11:39:56-05:00,BANK OF AMERICA: Buy these 17 growth stocks that are safe from the raging US-China trade war,"A group of Bank of America Merrill Lynch strategists make a compelling case for owning growth-oriented, idiosyncratic stocks with limited exposure to China as the trade war continues. They reveal the 12-month price target and implied upside for their top 17 stock picks. The average stock on their list has a long-term growth rate 9% higher than that of the S&P 500. Click here for more BI Prime stories. Two steps forward, and three steps back. That's the way the US-China trade spat has unfolded thus far. With tensions continuing to ebb and flow, investor patience surrounding the matter is growing thin. And, when the mood sours, the stocks most associated with the scuffle tend to get dumped the fastest. But not all stocks are exposed to the turmoil. And just because the macro environment is wracked with uncertainty at the moment doesn't mean there aren't opportunities waiting to be exploited. That's where a group of strategists at Bank of America Merrill Lynch come in. They've identified 17 growth-oriented stocks that aren't beholden to trade-war fluctuations — ones they believe will perform particularly well despite the challenging macro background. "" Our style work suggests that growth companies outperform during periods of slowing growth, and suggests that investors may want to seek shelter in less macro, more idiosyncratic growth stocks until we see signs of at least a temporary ceasefire,"" a group of the firm's strategists said. ""With trade drama heating up, macro is now impacting micro: earnings revisions and guidance reflect weakening corporate confidence."" The chart below shows growth stocks outperforming in periods of declining earnings.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-08-08 10:25:00-05:00,FIS is set to integrate Worldpay into its business,"This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Payments & Commerce subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here. Fidelity National Information Services (FIS), a financial services technology company, reported earnings for Q2 2019 , the last full quarter prior to its acquisition of payment processor Worldpay — valued at $43 billion — which closed on July 31. The quarter saw FIS individually bring in $2.1 billion in revenue, representing flat annual growth, while Worldpay racked up $1.1 billion in revenue, which was up 7% year-over-year (YoY). FIS, with Worldpay in tow, will boast three new business segments that will aim to leverage the combined strengths of the companies. Merchant Solutions: The businesses that will comprise this segment posted $1.1 billion in revenue in Q2 2019, up 8% YoY, making it the fastest-growing of the three segments. Merchant Solutions will be led by Worldpay's former President and COO Mark Heimbouch, per FIS Chairman, President, and CEO Gary Norcross on the company's earnings call .","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2019-08-06 07:48:00-05:00,"Fidelity National (FIS) Q2 Earnings as Expected, Costs Down","Fidelity National Information Services' (FIS) Q2 earnings reflect lower expenses, higher organic revenue growth and expanding margin.",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-08-05 02:34:00-05:00,What's in the Cards for Fidelity National (FIS) Q2 Earnings?,Fidelity's (FIS) Q2 results anticipated to reflect year-over-year improvement in earnings and revenues as well.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-08-02 08:27:00-05:00,Fidelity National (FIS) Completes Acquisition of Worldpay,Fidelity National (FIS) acquires ownership in Worldpay in a stock-cash deal to boost its revenue growth prospects.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-07-18 08:58:00-05:00,Facebook failed to allay skepticism US lawmakers voiced over Libra (FB),"This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here. In the first of two Congressional hearings into its ambitious alternative crypto-based financial system, Facebook came in for stinging criticism from US lawmakers, reports the Financial Times. The company had hoped to blunt the barrage of disapproval it's faced since announcing Libra last month. David Marcus, head of Calibra, the newly launched subsidiary tasked with developing a digital wallet for the crypto, told the Senate Banking Committee that the project will not be launched until regulatory approval has been granted, saying, ""We will take time to get this right,"" according to Bloomberg. Those efforts to mollify concerns appear to have failed, though, with Sherrod Brown, the most senior Democrat on the Senate Banking Committee, labeling the project delusional. Here's what it means: While lawmakers and regulators have raised concerns about cryptos, Facebook's recent history appears to be the biggest roadblock to Libra.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-07-09 09:42:00-05:00,Experian is investing in Singaporean ride-hailing firm Grab (EXPGY),"This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here . Grab, the Singaporean ride-hailing firm, has secured an undisclosed investment from the consumer credit reporting firm Experian as part of its ongoing Series H funding round, per a press release. Grab, which aims to raise $6.5 billion for its Series H round and secured $300 million from asset manager Invesco earlier in June for the round, has been increasingly broadening its financial services push. And the strategic partnership with Experian is aimed at helping the firm double down on its efforts to offer financial services to the region's huge underbanked population. Here's what it means: Grab's been aggressively pursuing the financial services sector over the last year — an effort the Experian tie-up should help accelerate. Southeast Asia's (SEA's) largest ride-hailing company has earmarked financial services as a core pillar of its strategy for regional dominance.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-07-01 09:55:02-05:00,Exclusive: FIS to win EU approval for $35 billion Worldpay deal:...,"U.S. financial services provider Fidelity National Information Services Inc (FIS) is set to gain unconditional antitrust approval from the European Union for its $35 billion bid for payments company Worldpay , people familiar with the matter said on Monday.",FIS,en,Reuters
2019-07-01 09:42:18-05:00,Exclusive: FIS to win EU approval for $35 billion Worldpay deal: sources,"U.S. financial services provider Fidelity National Information Services Inc (FIS) is set to gain unconditional antitrust approval from the European Union for its $35 billion bid for payments company Worldpay , people familiar with the matter said on Monday. Worldpay, spun off from Royal Bank of Scotland",FIS,en,Yahoo Finance
2019-06-28 13:46:38-05:00,These are the top 15 most-shorted companies in the stock market,"Short sellers — or traders who wager on stock declines — are alive and well as markets soar to new highs in 2019. High short interest often implies an outright bearish position on a stock, although it can also reflect simple downside hedging . Here are the stocks with the highest notional short interest, according to S3 Partners. Read more on Markets Insider. Shorts are in for summer. As the S&P 500 hits a fresh series of new record highs, traders are ramping up positions set to profit from share declines in some of the market's most popular companies. The likes of Tesla , Netflix , and more are attracting such wagers. So-called short sellers bet against shares — and make a profit — by borrowing them from investors who own them, selling them at the market price, and waiting for them to decline before purchasing them back to return to the owner. The higher the short interest is, the more money these traders have in play. That said, holding a short position on a stock can be extremely expensive and risky.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-06-24 22:30:43-05:00,"Debit cards show up more at retail stores, less at ATMs","MUMBAI: Bank customers are increasingly getting comfortable making payments through debit cards on swipe machines at kirana stores and local retail outlets. Latest data from the RBI show that over a third of all debit card transactions were made at point of sale (PoS) terminals in April this year for the first time since demonetisation.With about 80-crore withdrawals worth Rs 2.84 lakh crore in April, ATM transactions made for just over 66% of overall debit card transaction volume. PoS machines registered the rest 34% of the transaction volume in this period. The only other time the ATM transaction share fell below the two-thirds mark was in December 2016 — a month after demonetisation — when it was at 60.3% and PoS transactions at 39.7%, owing to the lack of cash in the system.The transaction share was 68.6% to 31.4% for ATMs and PoS in March this year while in January, ATMs made up for over 70% of debit card transaction volume share, an analysis of RBI data showed.The Reserve Bank of India, in its payments vision document published in May 2019, has set an objective of achieving a PoS-based debit card transaction share of 44% by 2021 to push New Delhi’s goal of a lesscash digital economy.",FIS,en,The Economic Times India
2019-06-21 09:48:00-05:00,HSBC and Roostify have launched a digital mortgage platform (HSBC),"This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here . HSBC, one of the largest banks in the world, has launched a digital mortgage platform in the US via a partnership with Roostify, the digital lending platform, per a press release. Teaming up with Roostify will help HSBC provide its customers with a faster and easier digital experience, the bank said. On the back end, the partnership will allow HSBC to process and close loans more efficiently. Here's what it means: Digitizing the mortgage lending process is key for incumbents to provide faster, easier, and more convenient experiences while also cutting costs. HSBC's new digital mortgage platform streamlines the loan application process for consumers. Through the partnership, Roostify integrates with the bank's loan origination system to increase the ease with which HSBC's lending team can transfer information and effectively communicate with customers.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-06-17 08:28:00-05:00,"Facebook has signed up Mastercard and Visa to back its crypto project (MA, V, FB)","This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here . Facebook's crypto ambitions are continuing apace, with the company signing up over a dozen companies to back its crypto plans, reports The Wall Street Journal. Visa, Mastercard, PayPal, and Uber are among the major players that will invest $10 million each as members of the Libra Association — a consortium that will govern Facebook's crypto. Others include Stripe, travel reservation platform Booking.com, and Argentina-based e-commerce company Mercado Libre, according to The WSJ citing people familiar with the matter. However, the final look of the consortium in terms of membership could change as talks with some partners remain ongoing. Facebook plans to announce the project this week, ahead of a 2020 rollout, according to the outlet. As part of the announcement, the social media giant will release a white paper introducing the coin and has asked the Libra Association members to cosign it.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-06-11 08:56:00-05:00,"Visa B2B Connect is going live worldwide (V, MA, DFS)","This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Payments Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here . B2B Connect, which leverages distributed ledger technology (DLT) to more simply allow banks to send high-value payments across borders, will become available to 15,000 financial institution partners in 30 markets worldwide that represent all five of Visa's business regions, Kevin Phalen, global head of Visa Business Solutions, told Business Insider Intelligence. The service was built in partnership with IBM, and both Bottomline Technologies and FIS will immediately begin offering the service to banking clients. Here's what it means: Visa's new platform aims to resolve pain points in the B2B payments space, which could fulfill a major need and garner usage quickly as a result. B2B payments are often slow, expensive, and paper-heavy, which can make it challenging for firms to pay suppliers and get paid — Visa's DLT-based system aims to resolve that.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-05-30 09:03:00-05:00,US open banking fintech unicorn Plaid has launched in the UK,"This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here . Plaid, the US fintech valued at $2.7 billion, has officially launched in the UK — marking its first expansion outside North America, per Financial News. The startup allows consumers to connect their bank accounts to other financial service providers through APIs. In the UK, Plaid will provide integrations with the eight largest banks and neobanks, accounting for 70% of current accounts in the country. Two firms, including personal finance management app Emma, have already signed up to use the startup's services in the country. Here's what it means: The UK is a leader in the global open banking movement, making it an ideal destination for Plaid's first overseas expansion. Plaid's core value proposition is based around making it easier for incumbent financial institutions (FIs) and fintechs to share consumer-permitted data.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-05-30 08:42:59-05:00,Global Payments Scales Up Yet Again,No summary available.,"FIS,FISV",en,Seeking Alpha
2019-05-30 06:19:34-05:00,"FIS boosts credit line, CP program to finance Worldpay deal",No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-05-14 15:56:19-05:00,Fidelity National prices notes offerings to finance Worldpay deal,No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-05-14 04:32:14-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services to offer senior notes,No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-05-06 09:12:12-05:00,Merger Arbitrage Mondays - New Higher Offer For Anadarko,No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-05-03 09:49:00-05:00,"IBM and Thomson Reuters have teamed up to launch an AI regtech solution (IBM, TRI)","This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here . IBM and Thomson Reuters have teamed up to launch a new AI-powered regtech solution to help banks better navigate growing regulatory requirements, per a press release . The solution will be delivered from the IBM Cloud that features real-time financial services data from thousands of content sources. The new solution aims to help compliance professionals keep up with regulatory changes, manage risk, and reduce the overall cost of compliance. Here's what it means: The new feature adds to existing regtech offerings from the partners, providing banks with a more thorough solution to navigate regulatory compliance. IBM and Thomson Reuters each offer regtech solutions already. Thomson Reuters delivers a view of the global regulatory environment using trusted intelligence, while IBM's existing solutions include IBM OpenPages with Watson, which provides visibility into pending regulatory changes.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-05-01 03:28:37-05:00,"Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (FIS) Q1 2019 Earnings Call Transcript","FIS earnings call for the period ending March 31, 2019.",FIS,en,The Motley Fool
2019-04-30 13:00:41-05:00,FIS jumps 3.3% after FY2019 revenue guidance boost,No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-04-30 11:20:10-05:00,"Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (FIS) CEO Gary Norcross on Q1 2019 Results - Earnings Call Transcript",No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-04-30 10:12:28-05:00,"Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. 2019 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call Slides",No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-04-30 06:07:21-05:00,"Fidelity National beats by $0.10, beats on revenue",No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-04-29 16:30:04-05:00,Fidelity National Q1 2019 Earnings Preview,No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-04-29 03:16:00-05:00,What's in Store for Fidelity National (FIS) Q1 Earnings?,"Fidelity's (FIS) first-quarter 2019 results anticipated to reflect year-over-year improvement in earnings, though revenues might record a decline.",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-04-23 09:32:21-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services (FIS) Earnings Expected to Grow: Should You Buy?,Fidelity National (FIS) doesn't possess the right combination of the two key ingredients for a likely earnings beat in its upcoming report. Get prepared with the key expectations.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-04-22 19:00:00-05:00,Financial institutions' investments in crypto firms are on pace for a record year,Major financial institutions (FIs) and tech firms are investing heavily in startups building technology to develop the crypto market.,FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-04-16 04:33:00-05:00,"Shift to digital payments is an opportunity, expert says","Alison Wilkes, head of payments for FIS, discusses the shift towards digital transactions.",FIS,en,CNBC
2019-04-11 09:50:00-05:00,Banks that fail to deliver high-quality digital experiences risk significant customer attrition (FISV),"This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here . Visit BusinessInsider.com for more stories. UK banks that fail to deliver high-quality digital experiences face the risk of significant customer attrition, per a survey of 1,000 bank and building society customers conducted on behalf of Fiserv. Of the respondents, 86% said they would consider switching their account provider if they struggled to manage their accounts easily through digital channels. Here’s what it means: Tech giants and fintechs have moved the needle when it comes to digital standards, and how banks respond is critical to their future. Eighty-two percent of consumers expect their financial service digital experiences to match or exceed that of tech giants. This demand for ease of use is almost identically high across every age group surveyed, with 78% of customers aged 55 or over — the lowest response — saying the same.","FIS,FISV",en,Business Insider
2019-04-10 08:37:00-05:00,"Brazil is leading LATAM in payments innovation, according to a new study (V)","This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Payments Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here . Visit BusinessInsider.com for more stories. Brazil is leading Latin America (LATAM) in payments technology innovation, as highlighted by a recent Visa study . Here’s what it means: Brazil's leadership in LATAM payments and technology innovation is creating opportunities for both domestic players and multinational payments firms looking to test new technologies in a regional market. Financial institutions (FIs) in Brazil are the regional leaders with respect to the implementation of new technologies. Fintechs and FIs are starting to adopt blockchain in the country, which is something that is “nearly unknown” elsewhere in the region, per Visa. And Brazilian banks and retailers are leading the way with biometric authentication too: Major Brazilian bank Banco do Brasil has offered fingerprint reading at its ATMs since 2013, for example, and Banco Bradesco initially piloted palm vein authentication to access ATMs without a PIN in 2006.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-04-04 09:46:02-05:00,"Wells Fargo joins the US contactless card pack (WFC, JPM, V, HSBC, C, SAN, COF)","This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Payments Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here . Wells Fargo announced that it will begin rolling out contactless credit and debit cards. New cardholders will receive contactless cards upon opening accounts and existing cardholders will receive contactless cards when their current cards expire. Debit cards will gain contactless capability this summer. And cardholders will be able to contactlessly withdraw money from all 13,000 Wells Fargo ATMs, 10,000 of which are already equipped with NFC technology. Here’s what it means: Wells Fargo joins the other first-time contactless issuers in the US that have recently moved in on the opportunity. The US has historically lagged been behind other countries with contactless card issuance: Just about 5% of US cards are currently contactless-enabled, compared with markets like Canada, where 95% of cards are contactless and over half of adults call themselves “regular” users.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-04-01 14:39:29-05:00,How To Make 15-25% On The Fidelity National Information Services-WorldPay Merger,No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-03-29 02:06:13-05:00,Global Payments: From Boring To Boardroom,No summary available.,"FIS,FISV",en,Seeking Alpha
2019-03-28 10:09:00-05:00,"Bank of America is piling on blockchain patents — but its tech chief is skeptical of the benefits (MER-K, SCBFF, HSBC, JPM, ING)","This is an excerpt from a story delivered exclusively to Business Insider Intelligence Fintech Briefing subscribers. To receive the full story plus other insights each morning, click here . Bank of America’s (BofA) tech and operations chief, Cathy Bessant, has expressed skepticism on the benefits of blockchain, despite the bank having received or applied for 82 patents for the technology, the most among financial institutions (FIs), per CNBC. Bessant said BofA's patents could allow the bank to plug into blockchain if the need arises going forward. However, she said that she has the most reservations about public blockchains, such as the one used by Bitcoin; she added that private blockchains could potentially enable FIs to cut costs and offer better services in the future. Notably, Besser also stated that she hasn’t seen a use case that makes a lot of sense for finance or that considerably enhances current methods. Here’s what it means: Bessant’s comments add further fuel to the ongoing debate about the prospects of the technology.",FIS,en,Business Insider
2019-03-27 09:09:07-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services: Truth Stranger Than Fiction,No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-03-26 03:49:47-05:00,Mastercard to invest $300M in Network International IPO,"Investment boom in the payments sector… Just a little over a week after FIS and Worldpay agreed to a $43B combination, Mastercard (MA) said it will inve",FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-03-25 19:46:17-05:00,"Merger Arbitrage Mondays - March 25, 2019",No summary available.,FIS,de,Seeking Alpha
2019-03-25 14:11:27-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services And Worldpay - Compelling Deal,FIS and Worldpay are combining their operations and are eating the lunch of the banks. Both companies have a great track record of dealmaking in the payment spa,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-03-21 12:36:00-05:00,Is 2019 The Year Of Payment Processing Mergers?,"Fidelity National Information Servcs Inc (NYSE: FIS) this week announced a massive $34-billion buyout of e-commerce and payments company Worldpay, Inc. …",FIS,en,Benzinga
2019-03-19 09:52:00-05:00,"Company News For Mar 19, 2019","Companies in the news are: OSTK, FIS, WP, EW and DERM",FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-03-19 08:39:39-05:00,"FIS, Worldpay Slide Post-Deal as Wall Street Downgrades","Shares of Fidelity National Information Services Inc. and Worldpay Inc. fell in early Monday trading, as investors and analysts keep digesting the implications of the international payments sector’s biggest-ever deal.",FIS,en,Bloomberg
2019-03-19 08:31:00-05:00,"Option-trading opportunities on Boston Scientific Corp., Cloudera Inc., The Walt Disney Co., Fidelity Information Services Inc., and Momo Inc.","NEW YORK , March 19, 2019 /PRNewswire/ -- InvestorsObserver issues critical PriceWatch Alerts for BSX, CLDR, DIS, FIS, and MOMO. Click a link below then choose between in-depth options trade idea report or a stock score report. Options Report – Ideal trade ideas on up to seven different options trading … Full story available on Benzinga.com",FIS,en,Benzinga
2019-03-18 12:11:00-05:00,FIS to Buy Worldpay in a Record-Breaking Payments Acquisition,"Fidelity National Information Services, which processes cards and ATM transactions, will pay $34 billion in stock for Worldpay, which is a leader in the payments space.",FIS,en,Barron's
2019-03-18 11:05:48-05:00,FIS And Worldpay Agree On $43 Billion Mega Merger,"FIS and Worldpay have complementary solutions and services encompassing financial institution issuer services, network and merchant services",FIS,en,ValueWalk
2019-03-18 09:59:25-05:00,U.S. firm FIS buys Worldpay for $35 billion in payments deal bonanza,"By Justin George Varghese, Rachel Armstrong and Pamela Barbaglia",FIS,en,Reuters
2019-03-18 09:05:39-05:00,Wall Street Analysts Question Merits (and Price) of $34 Billion FIS-Worldpay Deal,"Fidelity National Information Services Inc. and Worldpay Inc. pared earlier gains in Monday trading, as analysts question FIS’s pact to acquire Worldpay Inc. for about $34 billion in cash and stock, worth about $112.12 per share as of Friday’s close.",FIS,en,Bloomberg
2019-03-18 09:04:31-05:00,Worldpay +11% after FIS deal represents 14% premium,No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-03-18 08:09:23-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services buying Worldpay to create global payments giant,"Worldpay, formerly known as Vantiv, has agreed to sell to Fidelity National Information Services Inc. in a deal worth about $35 billion.",FIS,en,USA Today
2019-03-18 07:43:05-05:00,Worldpay Sold To Fidelity National In $34 Billion Deal To 'Accelerate The Future Of Finance',Fidelity National Information Servcs Inc (NYSE: FIS ) … Full story available on Benzinga.com,FIS,en,Benzinga
2019-03-18 06:54:20-05:00,U.S. fintech to buy Worldpay as electronic payments business booms,"U.S. fintech Fidelity National Information Services Inc (FIS) has agreed to buy payment processor Worldpay for about $35 billion, the biggest deal to date in the fast-growing electronic payments industry.",FIS,en,Reuters
2019-03-18 06:30:32-05:00,German Bank Giants In Merger Talks (Wall Street Breakfast Podcast),No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-03-18 06:13:37.837000-05:00,"FIS to Buy Worldpay, an E-Commerce Payments Processor, for $34 Billion","The deal, among the largest ever for a payments processor, comes amid a race to claim a piece of the growing market for online purchases.",FIS,en,The New York Times
2019-03-18 04:29:46-05:00,U.S. fintech FIS to buy payment processor Worldpay for about $35...,"U.S. fintech group Fidelity National Information Services Inc (FIS) has agreed to buy payment processor Worldpay for about $35 billion, in the biggest deal to date in the booming payments industry.",FIS,en,Reuters
2019-03-18 04:20:06-05:00,Fidelity National Buys Britain's Worldpay in $34 Billion Fintech Shakeup,Fidelity National Information Services agreed merger terms with WorldPay Monday in a deal that values the payment processor at around $35 billion….WP,FIS,en,The Street
2019-03-18 03:37:04-05:00,Fidelity National to buy payment processor Worldpay for about $35 billion,"U.S. fintech group Fidelity National Information Services Inc has agreed to buy payment processor Worldpay for about $35 billion (£26 billion), as it looks to bulk up in a lucrative yet rapidly changing industry.",FIS,en,Reuters UK
2019-03-18 03:21:41-05:00,Fidelity National scoops up Worldpay for $35B,No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-03-18 03:21:06-05:00,UK finance firm in $43bn sale to US rival,"WorldPay, once part of RBS bank, has been bought by Fidelity National Information Services.",FIS,en,BBC
2019-03-18 02:58:00-05:00,Fidelity National Information Services to Buy Worldpay for $35 Billion,"FIS has agreed to acquire Worldpay for about $35 billion in cash and stock, creating a global payments giant in a bid to reach more customers as merchants and their clients complete an increasing number of transactions online.",FIS,en,The Wall Street Journal
2019-03-18 02:55:23-05:00,UPDATE 1-Fidelity National to buy payment processor Worldpay for about $35 bln,"U.S. fintech group Fidelity National Information Services Inc has agreed to buy payment processor Worldpay for about $35 billion, as it looks to bulk up in a lucrative yet rapidly changing industry.",FIS,en,Reuters
2019-03-18 02:31:40-05:00,Fidelity National to buy Worldpay for $34.83 bln,"U.S.-based fintech group Fidelity National Information Services Inc (FIS) has agreed to buy payment processor Worldpay for $34.83 billion, as it looks to bulk up in a rapidly changing industry.",FIS,en,Reuters
2019-03-18 01:32:12-05:00,FIS buying Worldpay in $43 billion cash-and-stock deal,"Financial services technology group FIS said Monday that it will buy e-commerce and payments group Worldpay Inc. in a cash and stock deal that values the latter at $43 billion. Under terms of the deal, which includes the assumption of debt, Worldpay shareholders will receive 0.9287 FIS shares and $11 in cash per share. At the deal's closing, FIS shareholders will own 53% of the combined company and Worldpay shareholders will own 47%. The new company will have around $12.3 billion pro forma 2018 annual revenue, and FIS' organic revenue growth outlook will accelerate to a range of 6% to 9% through 2021. The company expects $500 million of revenue synergies, $400 million of run-rate expense synergies, which refers to the full-year impact of an event that has occurred for a portion of the year, and nearly $4.5 billion of free cash flow in three years. Market Pulse Stories are Rapid-fire, short news bursts on stocks and markets as they move. Visit MarketWatch.com for more information on this news.",FIS,en,MarketWatch
2019-03-14 08:30:31-05:00,Why Is Fidelity National (FIS) Up 0.8% Since Last Earnings Report?,Fidelity National (FIS) reported earnings 30 days ago. What's next for the stock? We take a look at earnings estimates for some clues.,FIS,en,Zacks Investment Research
2019-03-14 07:35:00-05:00,"The Zacks Analyst Blog Highlights: Fidelity National Information Services, Square, Euronet Worldwide And Worldpay",https://www.investing.com/analysis/the-zacks-analyst-blog-highlights-fidelity-national-information-services-square-euronet-worldwide-and-worldpay-200397622,FIS,en,Investing.com
2019-02-12 14:03:07-05:00,"Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. (FIS) CEO Gary Norcross on Q4 2018 Results - Earnings Call Transcript",No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-02-12 09:50:17-05:00,"Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. 2018 Q4 - Results - Earnings Call Slides","The following slide deck was published by Fidelity National Information Services, Inc. in conjunction with their 2018 Q4 earnings call.",FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-02-12 07:03:22-05:00,"Fidelity National beats by $0.02, misses on revenue",No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
2019-02-11 17:30:30-05:00,Fidelity National Q4 Earnings Preview,No summary available.,FIS,en,Seeking Alpha
